Despite it being such a blatant provocation— Stephanie still accepted it
without flinching.
".......Okay, let's do this then— 【Acciente】!!!"
—That was an oath to make sure the game followed the [Ten Oaths].
A word that declares full intention to God to perform a wager in absolute
compliance to the [Ten Oaths]— swearing to God, the absolute requirement
when gambling.
"OK, then I shall also- 【Acciente】."
Sora gave a leering smile— that vow from his mouth was both unpredictable
and askew.
In Stephanie's mind, she began thinking intensely.
(—Only throw out paper?)
(Unless he thinks that I would cheerfully throw out scissors.)
(Looking at the conditions he suggested— his intentions are obvious.)
(The goal of that man— is to reach a tie.)
(This man is only trying to get food and accommodation— he doesn't really
understand the cheat.)
(This should not be the truth now.)
(If he would lose if he doesn't use paper, then my chances of winning are—)
Rock: 2 wins, 1 loss. Scissors: 2 wins, 1 draw. Paper: 1 win, 2 draws.
(He announced that he wouldn't choose anything other than paper.)
(If I innocently sent out scissors, he would choose rock.)
(He plans on mocking me by saying "Haha, just as I expected~ It was hard
on you, you single-celled idiot".)
(But if that was so, if I used paper— it would be impossible for me to lose.)
(But it would stillfulfill his goals if the result was a draw.)
(—This man, definitely thinks that I won't use rock—.)
(Because, that's the only choice that I have with a possibility of losing!)
(—Treating me like an idiot!)
(Both rock and scissors are good, my chances of winning are [2:1])
(Thinking as you wish— I will not let you get away with a draw!)
Trying to penetrate through Sora, Stephanie stared at him with sharp eyes.
"——"
—However, Stephanie, who looked at Sora's expression, could not help but
take a deep breath.
Because there was a skinny man that was troublesome— or not.
Calmly, the man that was confident that he would win revealed a faint smile.
Seeing Sora's expression— blood rushed into Stephanie's head once again,
as if a bucket of cold water had been poured on her.
(—No, don't be impetuous, keep calm.)
Finishing those words in her head, Stephanie started brainstorming again.
Rashness, emotions and simplicity- what if he sees through all of these?
Stephanie said to herself and noticed something.
—Right.
This, of course, was an obvious matter.
(This guy—this man—declared that paper was the only exception!)
(In addition, no matter what other method he uses, he can not [Win].)
(So— no matter what I choose, this man only announced that he would
choose [Paper].......)
(Victory would come to him if he happens to get a lucky draw and a tie
would be expected— that's right!)
(The possibility of losing— is the same no matter what!)
"Then, should we start?"
Sora asked with the air of winner— but.
"Yeah, you too. Are you prepared to comply to the Oaths?"
Likewise, Stephanie who believed that she would win, replied.
(I have already seen through your tricks— go on and put on the expression of
a lost dog
[12]
!)
"Then let's begin. Ready- rock, paper...—"
—Rock.
Stephanie had used [Scissors].
"What—"
—Widening her eyes because Sora had chosen [Rock].
"Whu, What— Wh, Why.......like this....."
"Although it is laudable that you honestly came out with rock and did not give
into the provocation— in the end you are still too inexperienced."
Saying that— the ruthless edge and thin smile disappeared from Sora's face.
Sora sat on the bed again, and lightly talked through the inner thought
processes of Stephanie to her.
"My provocation was to make rock appear to you as the only way you could
lose."
"........"
"—But my calm expression drove in an understanding that only by using
paper would I [Win]."
"—Wha......I was being read— So that expression.......was all an act!?"
"So far so good......But choosing [Paper] would have made me lose........this
way, not only would you defeat my only chance of winning, you could also
double your possibility of winning against me."
—Everything was seen through- no, everything was manipulated by him.
"Guuu—"
Stephanie bit her lips and knelt down with her hands supporting her body.
The calming down process.....not only that, but even the winning idea that
Stephanie had thought out was also predicted.
—Finally, this.
The reason why Stephanie lost during the day- this was the hint.
However, Sora continued.
"So, yeah, it was already decided that I would win from the outset of this
game."
"I know. You were aiming for a draw, right? Okay, what accommodations
—"
Stephanie who had lost casually replied- but.
"Well, about that right there. You're wrong, you know?"
".......Ah?"
"Try re~ally hard to recall it, okay? How did I say it?"
"I can make do with a trivial wish. Although what we have on hand seems like
it'll last us a few days— I'll be straightforward, after four days ofstaying here,
we'll have no food or place to stay. And in the long run, we are still worrying
about what to do next......."
"Right, there's a problem here! When...did I ever say what the specific
contents of my [Trivial wish] were?"
"...................Ah!?"
Stephanie hurriedly got up and protested.
"Eh, because, didn't you already affirm that you only required
accommodation!?"
"Un, but I didn't confirm it~"
Stephanie tried to recall what had happened like a video playback with
sound, fully utilizing her mind.
With no place to stay, no food, how did he conceal the next words.
Sora—this man—had only....
Smiled.
—So the reason for his wishful thinking was to scrounge for more—
"Ah—ah—"
"Looks like you understand! Then please listen carefully to my [Trivial wish]♪"
With Sora wearing a smile, 'Sha'— he suddenly pointed his finger towards
Stephanie.
"Fall in love with me!"
Part 9
………………—
.......A long silence.
The first to break the awkwardness, the one who was always silent, was
Shiro who watched innocently from the sidelines.
".......Erm, Nii?"
"Hehehe, what is it, my little sister. Was my plan so perfect that it moved you
to speechlessness?"
Although he could not understand his little sister's intentions, Sora was already
intoxicated with his perfect command.
【6】 "As per the Oath", the wager will be unconditionally adhered to.
Also considering the case of the ninth Oath— because of God's power, the
order couldn't be stopped by anything.
Well, of course, that also includes the individual's free will!
But—
"........That.........is..........what is going on..........?"
Facing against his little sister who was simply clueless, Sora also made an
expression as if he did not understand anything.
"Oya, it really is surprising that you don't understand, my little sister. Isn't
there a saying that 'love is blind'? If it is in absolute compliance with the
Oaths, then of course she would have to completely [Dedicate herself] to me,
right? Accommodation, money, even talent can be gained...isn't this killing
three birds with one stone♪"
Sora said it like this, wondering why she couldn't understand even though she
had such a good mind.
Shiro muttered softly.
"......."Become my property".......wouldn't that........do?"
"———Nn?"
".........For that........you.........get everything."
"—Eh, ah.....ehhhh?"
Sora was confused for an instant. After that he started accelerating his
thinking process.
If it was just as his little sister had said, the command of [Become my
property]...
Everything that belongs to a property naturally belongs to its master—
"Ah, eh? Wouldn't that kind of way be much more favorable.......huh?"
(Why didn't I think of that——?)
Shouldn't he have said that.
Planning policies had always been thought out by himselfsince the beginning,
so why would Sora, who claimed that he had the performance and strength,
do that—
"...............Nii......your own wish..........was mixed inside?"
"——Ahhhh......."
Shiro— gazed coldly at him with half-closed eyes, and not because she was
still drowsy.
"AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!"
Sora cried and hugged his head.
"I, I actually.........turned out to be like this!? Was it about that- if I missed this
chance, I'll never get a girlfriend?! Did the superficialsense of inferiority of not
having a girlfriend cloud my judgement at the last minute!? No,
im...impossible......how could I, I make such a silly mistake—"
Impossible.
For one of the wings of 『 』 to commit such a mistake— Sora felt dizzy.
As ifshe was unhappy with something, Shiro continued to say with her cold
voice.
"......Nii.........you said you had......no need for a girlfriend.................that as
long as Shiro was here.......that would be good enough............"
"That was me saying too much! Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh! I am so sorry,
ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh!"
With his little sister pouting on the bed, Sora knelt in front of her as if in a
devout kind of worship and apologized.
"Af, after allI am unable to do those kind of things to my little sister! You are
only 11 years old! If I did it, I would be taken away by the cops! And with
your brother of age, this sort of desire is natural—"
Sora who was chattering all kinds of excuses. And Shiro who was staring
with cold eyes.
Furthermore,
"—"
After being requested to fall in love, Stephanie was thrown aside and had her
head lowered while trembling.
Yes. Just as Sora had thought, there could be absolutely no refusal to the
Oaths. Which was this world's absolute law.
But— her cheeks were burning, and the rapid beating of her heart could not
be stopped.
Because Sora had ignored her to talk to his little sister, Stephanie felt worried.
—Even if this was the law of this world.
No.
Because of this man.
Because of this guy.
—She actually— "felt jealous"—!
"How can I acknowledge thiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiis!"
"Whoa, that scared me!"
With the force built up from her anger, Stephanie finally shrieked out.
Intending to resist the implanted feelings, she glared at Sora— but.
"—Wh, whoaa!"
When their eyes met, her heartbeat suddenly quickened and her face became
hotter.
"Wh, wha, what what what kind of [Trivial wish] was that! You, you dare toy
with a maiden's heart!?"
To try and avoid this effect, Stephanie changed her line ofsight and shouted.
Despite standing up aggressively, she still lacked a bit of momentum.
"Ah, that........about that......."
Sora scratched his cheeks, and shifted away his eyes with an embarrassed
look on his face.
He had originally wanted a development to happen, but due to his huge
mistake, some of his goals were not achieved and Sora could not help but be
worried.
"That, about that, Shiro? What do I do?"
"........I.....don't know....."
"Guuuuuu......"
Losing face and seeking help from his little sister, only to be coldly cast aside
—
"What a pain— *cough*!"
No matter. Sora, who had finally made up his mind, coughed.
He decided to treat the mistake as if it did not even happen.
Sora, feeling good again, could not help but giggle.
"The definition of trivial depends on the person. You only wanted one bite of
the dessert, but that one bite was the whole thing
[13]
..."
Probably back to his normalstate, Sora fluently said this.
"Isn't, isn't that a fraud!"
But, Stephanie didn't accept his form of interpretation and strongly rebutted.
—The voice of Sora that flowed into her ears made her feel embarrassed.
Even though she really hoped that he would close his mouth, the problem was
that she actually wanted to listen to his voice.
Using a [Request for an explanation] as an excuse to try and do this, she
repressed the entanglement in her heart and retorted.
With absolutely no idea of how to deal with the kind of feelings entangling in
Stephanie's heart(nor any reason to), Sora (eighteen years old, virgin) calmed
down.
And as if pointing out a childish mistake, he pointed to Stephanie.
"Yup, right there. You were paying attention to the content of the game, yet
you ignored the [Premise] of it. That won't do, without any specific nature of
this statement........for example, even if an alarmist emphasizes on hearing the
winning conditions, sometimes their focus will deliberately get fuzzed up, get
it~"
—After all, the purpose of this game was to have a draw.
That was what Stephanie had thought so far.
But that was still not enough, there were still parts that weren't thought of.
Whether he won or drew— Stephanie's risks were the same.
This was the true point of the game— which is to say—
"You, you— swindler!"
Yes, the so-called [Fraud].
There was indeed a reason for why Stephanie had shouted— however.
"Oioi, saying that is too over the top~ obviously it was the fault of the one
being cheated~"
"Th, these are the lines of a swindler!"
Facing against Stephanie, whose protests were never ending, the clamor
finally drove Shiro to speak.
"........Of the [Ten Oaths].....Three......In games....... wagers will be made on
what both parties decide to be of equal value."
Because Shiro finally changed back, Sora ecstatically continued.
"Yes! The main point is 'to be of equal value'. After that, four: unless contrary
to "Three", the game content and the things wagered do not matter— which is
to say?"
Moving her fingers around, Shiro answered.
".......Life.......and human rights........can be wagered......."
"Yes, exactly♪ Which means that when the bet was decided, the game had
already begun."
As if explaining to Stephanie, only the conversation between the siblings could
be heard.
Shiro then said.
"..........But........it wasn't necessary..........to even wager feelings."
"That's not it! This was to confirm if even free will and resistance could be
dominated over—"
".......Nii."
"Sorry."
It appeared that the effect of 'treating the mistake like it never happened' did
not work on his little sister.
"But, but—! Using this kind of fraud—!"
With fraud, forcing her first love to be—
Stephanie, who rebutted in tears, originally wanted to raise cruel accusations.
But-
"........Sixth of the [Ten Oaths].......the wager.........will be unconditionally
adhered to......."
The eleven-year old girl— with eyes filled with compassion and calmness,
issued the final blow.
"...........Easily forgetting the weight of the premise.........falling to the
provocation......that was all you."
—Yes, the Ten Oaths had to be followed.
【5】 The challenged party has the right to decide the contents of the game.
Stephanie had the right to refuse the game, and also the right to change its
content.
The one who wasted those rights, submissively offered a wager, and
accepted the game was not anybody else—
"—Guuu....."
—It was Stephanie herself.
Perhaps having nothing else to say, Stephanie planted her rear end on the
ground.
In fact, the Oaths that were set up— were currently influencing Stephanie.
These Oaths were legitimately recognized by the world of this game.
No matter what Stephanie said, she had already lost, and the bet had been
established.
"Then, I guess you have accepted it, Stephanie?"
"—Guuu.......you.....!"
Rubbish! Was what she had intended to add on.
—But her feelings did not allow her to do so.
Not only that, a sweet feeling went into her heart just by being called by her
name—
"—Guu— why is this happening, agghhhhhhhhhhh!"
With a fire that couldn't be released, Stephanie got into a kneeling posture
and used her head to repeatedly bang the ground.
"Whoa— are, are you alright!?"
"How do I look alright to you!?"
Trying to ignore the pain of her slowly swelling forehead, Stephanie glared at
Sora, which made him cringe. However.
"No, not at all. B-but I did win the bet, so— can I make a request?"
Request—
Yes...after all, Sora's motive was not for her to fall in love with him, but for
the things that resulted from that.
Stephanie then remembered what he had said earlier, that love would lead to
her dedication.
However— hold on, Stephanie.
Sora's request was to 'fall in love with him'.
But not to 'follow his orders', right?
In other words, Stephanie had no obligation to accept any of his requests.
"Well......hehehe, looks like you had a miscalculation......."
Understanding this, then everything was very simple.
No matter what requests were put forward, just answer [NO!] and
everything would be settled.
Doesn't that solve everything!
"Okay. First of all, because Stephanie is too long, can I shorten it to Steph
instead?"
"Hmmm? Ah, okay, no problem at all♪— ahh!"
—Gaining a new nickname, [Steph] smiled and nodded.
The rationality and resolution to [Reject everything] two seconds ago had
completely disappeared.
The maiden who had turned simple due to love and would inevitably blush
when getting called by a nickname—
"Nu—noo, nam..name, there is nooo.....need to be worried.....about
call....calling me by a nickname......! Names don't matter! Un un, just like that,
un! Then after that I'll be fine if I just don't accept any other requests!"
But Steph who constrained herself to agree did not realize.
As long as she hurriedly escaped from this room, nothing else would happen.
Which is to say— she unconsciously had a desire to stay by Sora's side.....
"Un, well, it would be great if you could call me Sora. Steph, you are of royal
lineage, right?"
—Here it comes.
Right, if the motive was support, then he'll demand money, accommodation
and food.
He would do this in order to get those things.
However, these requests that were going to be made, did not bind Steph to
comply to his demands.
Hehe, Steph laughed in her heart.
If Sora requested, she would bluntly reply with a 'I refuse!'.
Let this swindler have a feeling of defeat— and his expression would be
worth watching at that time.
With her corresponding lines ready, Steph waited for Sora's request.
"In that case, your house must be very spacious. Can we stay with you for a
while?"
"—Ah, okay, no problem❤"
—…… ..
Eh?
"Eh, ehhhh? Why? Hmm?"
Steph fell into disarray because she did not understand what she had just said.
However, her face had such a fiery feeling that she was going to have a
nosebleed, which then prompted Steph to think back to Sora's words.
'Can we stay with you'—
That means staying together.
Cohabitation......which means a man and a woman living together.
Being able to stay together.
Which means......along with the bed, the bathroom and the like could be
shared—
"Ah, ah, ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh, not right! This is not right! It's not that
way!"
Watching Steph continuously headbutting the wooden wall with a 'Dong Dong
Dong'- Sora, who was scared pale, asked.
"Uh, umm, how do I say this...even though the situation has become very
strange...........is it okay?"
"How could this do!— ahhh.............everything is already useless........"
Steph faced the ceiling and gave a hollow laugh.
—Yup, Sora did commit a huge mistake.
Presenting requests without any [Contractually obligation].
But Sora's age equals how long he's been without a girlfriend.
He can't understand Steph because she is experiencing her first love.
Historically, love has been one of the reasons countries have fallen to ruin.
—This is just too contemptuous.
Part 10
"He, hehe........enough..........I give up, I don't care anymore, I will do
anything you want."
Lying on the wooden floor, the frustrated yet sobbing Steph said.
Even though she wasn't bound contractually, she had already shown no will to
refuse any orders.
Steph realized this point, and with expressionless eyes, said this while stifling
her laughter.
"—No more other requests? Oh, whatever, I don't care anymore."
—
Reaching this point, there was something missing in Steph's considerations.
Because she never expected to be asked to 'fall in love with him', just grant to
requests.
"Ah—........um, yes....."
Sora gave a glance to Shiro.
What the meaning behind that glance was, Steph wasn't sure of.
Shiro softly nodded.
".........Waiting.......for Shiro to be eighteen......Nii........is too pitiful."
"Could you please not use the word 'pity' to describe it? And also, don't you
know that even when you're eighteen, your brother still can't do anything to
his little sister?"
".....So."
Shiro squeezed her thumb in between her index and middle fingers, and said
with a deadpan expression.
".........Nii.......grats.....on your graduation from virginity."
"—Whu-"
—Yes.
Was it because the development was too good, or did it simply lack
imagination.
Requesting the body, this development was of course natural.
Steph, who had entirely abandoned her will earlier, had the flaming light of
resistance lit up in her yet again.
"Wha, whu whu, what? I, I, I didn't listen to it before! Thi, thi, for this kind of
thing, there must be a certain atmosphere, a situation where it is natural— ah?
Huh?"
However, the reason her eyes had regained their light was not due to the fear
of her losing her virginity— strange.
—She was looking forward to it. Steph, who had noticed this, once again
tried to drive her head into the wall.
Sora was completely oblivious towards Steph, who was carrying these subtle
thoughts while ramming her head, and flatly said.
"No, until Shiro is eighteen years old, allR-18 things and everything related is
banned."
"—Eh?"
Steph whispered, but it was still heard.
"........Don't mind......Shiro....."
"But I do mind a lot! I will absolutely not allow children to see pornographic
scenes!"
"........Nii...........didn't you just tell her.........to fallfor you..........because
you're bad with rape.........and the like, right?"
"No, that...why do you understand my sexual preferences?"
"........The game boxes............leaving them and the games.....and everything
else around the room...............I know everything."
Steph was dumbfounded just by listening to the siblings' dialogue.
But, both parties have been ignoring this fact.
—Their arguments about M-18 related stuffstemmed from the fact that the
[Sister was accompanying them].
"—Um, wouldn't it be settled if you let your sister out of the room?"
"Hmm? Although I am quite happy that you are looking forward to it, that
can't be done due to complicated circumstances."
"—NO! Nooo, are you stupid? Are you an idiot!?"
Tossing aside the flushed Steph.
Just like a scholar who tried to find a solution to an enormous problem.
Both of them, who were brooding and folding their arms, finally seemed to
have an intelligent look on their faces.
".........Then."
Saying this, Shiro expressionlessly came up with a solution.
"......Then barely safe for work..............take action."
"Ohhh! This one! As expected of my little sister, indeed you are talented."
".......Eh?"
Hearing the words of praise coming out of Sora's mouth, Shiro revealed a
joyous expression.
Also— she didn't understand it at all.
It looked like they had found "the method to achieve the objectives" that
complied with the 'little sister accompanies', which alerted Steph.
"—But, to what kind of extent?"
".......Nii, this type of field
[14]
...is complacent....."
"We had encountered this "Type of field" in mangas and games, but this kind
of matter doesn't apply to me, which I will clearly state first, my little sister."
".......Because............you're a virgin.......so you don't know...........what to
do?"
Saying this accurate, yet bitter statement to Sora, Shiro raised up her smart
phone.
"........Shiro will give instructions.....while videotaping........"
"Un, instructions are fine, but why is the camera necessary, little sister?"
"........Nii.......don't you want fap material......?"
"Un, although the thoughts you have worry me...but I will gratefully accept
your thoughtfulness."
With mixed feelings, Sora turned towards Steph.
On the other hand, Steph was unaware of what the smartphone was and
froze motionlessly.
Starting the video, Shiro gave the first set of instructions.
".........Take...one.....starting from.....suddenly.........falling down?"
"Oh— so it'll be that kind of development, eh. Erm.........how do I fall in this
kind ofsituation—"
Sora was searching around for something that he could stumble on, when
slowly.
".........Un."
Shiro gently kicked him.
"Whoa— so that's how it is, oh— I'm gonna fall!"
Sora said, as he skillfully read Shiro's intentions.
"—Ah?"
With mediocre, or perhaps even worthless acting, Sora pushed Steph until
they hit the floor.
His hands that were pressing on Steph—
—Were in the same place as in any conventionalstoryline, unto Steph's
breasts.
If there was one word that Steph would use to describe the situation, to let
others understand this kind of "rotten and vulgar development"— it would be
the word "violent".
"........Take....2...........because of a force majeure
[15]
, he groped them..."
"That......if it was accidental then it wouldn't be a force majeure......"
"......Then.......are you giving up?"
"I'll do it, director. I will work hard— sex!"

Grope grope grope. Grope grope grope.
Grope grope grope. Grope grope grope.
Shake shake shake. Shake shake shake.
Shake shake shake. Shake shake shake.
"Wah......"
His thoughts frozen, the sensation of the rather plump feeling caused Sora to
be speechless and he could only say an interjection.
On the other hand, Steph widened her eyes, but it eased down.
Because the reason why she could not catch up with the development—
Was this point, which of course was one of them.
But above all else— experiencing the feeling of being touched by his hands,
Steph did not know why she felt like she was going to melt.
"—Wuu......ah~"
The sound that leaked out from Steph's mouth was covered by her hands,
fortunately unheard by those two peoples's ears.
"—Well, well, well........3, 3D isn't all that bad after all........uh— errr,
director. This levelstill counts as [All ages], right?"
".....Un.....but, Nii........too much groping........"
Shiro slightly frowned, while looking at her own chest which was could be
compared to an airport runway
[16]
.
"Oh— is that so. Since the groping was an accident, it would still be a bit
rotten and vulgar even if it is 3D— then, guu, what to do next? Director."
"......Take.....3, from here, nipslip."
"Is that stillsafe for work?"
Sora could not help but raise that question, while Shiro solemnly said.
"........If it is by J*MP standards..........then even being fully
naked........doesn't matter......"
"No no, it will be bad if it was fully naked! Is there really such a thing as a
nipple in reality?"
"......The...........video, will be cropped, and altered........"
"Director, this is live. The situation is happening now. You can't white-out or
alter that."
"..........Then.........underclothes?"
".......Ah, if it is to that degree— but it is difficult to undress in this situation."
Facing Sora who appreciated the pains of making a film, Shiro said.
".........Nii, not above..............if it's, below."
"Ah, flipping the skirt will also cause light blockage! You really are capable to
a high degree, director."
Just when Sora stretched his hand to lift up Steph's skirt.
Steph, whose brain had already melted, started to reignite.
—Flip.....skirt?
Underclothes— which means that my panties will be seen by him?
—No, I will be troubled by this.
The top is fine.
No, the top is not fine.
It was not just the residual effects of Steph's rationalside. But it was also her
instincts that warned her.
The bottom is not fine.
It can't be fine, unacceptable in any case. At least for now, it is unacceptable.
Well, how to say it better.
—Although it was implanted feelings.
To be pushed down by the person you liked, even groped by him.
Because when the inevitable would happen— there would be a change in the
[living status].
"—Yi— yahaaaaaaaaaa!?"
That kind of instinct compelled Steph's melted brain to suddenly move.
In an instant, Steph swiped off Sora's hand, and hit him.
"Whoaa—!"
Sora, who was in a kneeling posture in preparation to flip her skirt, lost his
balance when gently pushed.
Despite trying to avoid the fall, and being barely able to maintain his standing
posture, disaster still ensued.
In order to prevent himself from collapsing, Sora pulled away the distance
and took a few steps back.
—That is when Sora retreated to the door. And after being pushed gently by
Steph, he hit a bump on the wall, then.
—A 'dong' came as a response.
"Ouch!"
Sora with his head aching cried out.
—But it wasn't over yet.
—Alas, what a cheap hotel.
The impact of Sora against the cheap door burst open the hinges, and just like
that, he fell into the corridor.
"..........Nii."
"Eh—eh, wait—"
As if trying to drown out the worried voices of the two people.
'Kaching'——.......the sound of the cheap metal hinges.
—Then a thud.
Because of the reaction of violently opening the door, it quietly swung back
and— closed up.
Part 11
—……
Momentarily, Steph was clueless of what was happening and stood there
motionless.
But because of the fact that Sora had flown into the corridor after being hit by
her...
"—Ah! Sora?"
For the first time, Steph called out the name of that [Man], while standing up
in a panic.
—She had the feeling of her heart being grabbed, while oozing out
uneasiness.
She concluded that due to her actions, she may have caused injury to others
and had a feeling of pure worry.
Not to mention that she may be hated. This kind of anxiety— she decidedly
wouldn't accept it.
Saying this to herself, Steph panicked and rushed out to open the door to the
corridor.
Outside the door, in a corner of the corridor, Sora was trembling while
hugging his head.
"How did—!"
Steph clearly remembered that she didn't use nearly enough strength to push
Sora here.
But the truth was that Sora was indeed in the corner.
"So, Sora!? Are you alright?!"
He was hugging his head to his knees.
It couldn't be due to the head colliding with the door right?—Steph started to
look pale, but—
"Sorry sorry sorry I apologize I apologize so please forgive me!"
—It looked like it was not due to the impact.
Sora only curled up on the ground and continuously offered an apology.
"—Eh?"
"Sorry sorry I thought I would never have another chance to touch breasts
and I'm a guy after all and I wanted at least one girlfriend I was distracting
myself no I know please don't glare at me like that yes I'm scum yes I'm a
pervert I know sorry sorry sorry!"
—It was clearly that arrogant Sora who had committed that degree of fraud
and sexual harassment.
But now he was trembling just like a new-born lamb, constantly apologizing.
".......What, what is going on?"
Steph did not understand this situation at all.
Therefore she looked to the sister—Shiro-to ask for an answer, and went
into the room.
".........Nii...Nii.........where.......don't.......leave Shiro...........alone........"
—Sitting on the bed, in the exact state as her brother.
Large round teardrops constantly rolled and curled into drops, and in
addition, kept tumbling down Shiro's trembling yet deadpan expression.
"—Wha, what is going on with them? These siblings."
Forgetting about the groping of her chest, Steph stood there in a daze.
—……
Yes, this is 『 』— Sora and Shiro.
The two-in-one gamer.
This is above being strong or weak in all genres.
But once the two of them are separated— which is to say.
When alone, one becomes an anthrophobic person who can't even
communicate properly with others—
When alone, one becomes an incurable social outcast.
"....Nii.....Nii, where are you....."
"Sorry sorry sorry sorry sorry!"
Everyone should understand by now.
One is a NEET.
One is a hikikomori.
These siblings with an age gap ofseven years could be together only in one
place, their [home]—
This— this is the truth behind the [Urban Legend] of 『 』.
Chapter 2 - Challenger/Challenger
Part 1
Kingdom of Elchea, Capital of Elchea— Western Region, District 3.
After threatening the boss to stay in the Inn, the siblings didn't even last one
night before wordlessly checking out.
However, the second morning had already arrived for the siblings who were
currently lodging in Stephanie Dora's home.
No, to be exact— on the second morning, the siblings had arrived in the
bathroom of her house.
".......Nii.......I hope.....you can explain."
The naked Shiro asked while being shampooed.
"Explain? If it is about the cleaning scene, then there won't be any sort of
development if it isn't a bathing scene, should I explain more?"
"........Nii...........bathing scene.......otherwise..........grade
schoolers.............are, perfect NG's
[17]
......"
"Don't worry little sister, the infamous [Mist block] will play a role, and make
the scene [Pure]."
Sora gazed at the unnaturally thick mist in the bathroom and said this.
"Could it be, because of this reason, you actually 'boiled up the entire bath'?"
Steph responded with a dumbfounded expression while washing Shiro's hair.
"Exactly this reason. This is an important place after all."
"Did you know, because of this, the servants had to needlessly burn that much
firewood?"
And after boiling the bath, it was common sense to not soak into it.
Senselessly wasting all that water to create a mist effect.........
"If you want to say it like that, then what about a particular person who gets
to enjoy such a large bath and still has the audacity to accuse someone of
being wasteful."
"—Guuu...."
(As expected of the lineage of royalty.)
Steph was actually much wealthier than what Sora had imagined.
The house was built with Roman-styled infrastructures, so it would not be
inappropriate to call it a [Castle], much to the chagrin of the siblings who only
knew Japan. Furthermore, the personal bath that Steph had was spacious
enough to fit ten people inside.
The baths, which were also Roman-styled, were currently boiled up to make
the scene [For all ages].
With this level of luxury displayed, people really couldn't help but wonder if
this was really a house from a race that was on the verge of destruction.
"And also, I'm sorry. Because my sister hates to take baths— She also
stubbornly believes that [This includes even if an eleven-year old girl is in an
eighteen-year old's ero book] so she wouldn't let me help her wash, which
explains why she rarely takes a bath. But yesterday she said that if it was in a
clean scene then it was okay, so I thought there was no reason not to take
advantage of that."
"........Guuuu......Nii, hate."
But the bottom line, this rule should be the most applicable to Steph.
Shiro lamented, implying that she was protesting.
"Little sister, if you take care of yourself then you will become super beautiful,
so be a good girl and take a bath."
"......It's fine.....if I'm not a beauty."
"Your brother loves a beautiful Shiro."
"........Guuuuuuuuuuu........"
Muttered Shiro in a low voice. She found it hard to complain more after
hearing Sora say that.
But it will be fine either way.
No, they had attracted unpleasant emotions due to their intimate relationship
as siblings, but this fact was ignored.
Compared to that, there was something even more concerning that was at
hand.
(This situation. Why did it happen in the first place?)
(Why am I washing a fully naked Shiro's hair, while Sora is wearing clothes
and standing on the opposite side?)
"—Sora.......why, do I have to wash Shiro's hair?"
—No, it shouldn't be this thorough.
These queries were raised after suffering from a deep remorse on why she did
not reject him before.
"Did you listen to what I said? It's because if you don't do it, Shiro willrefuse
to take a bath."
"Do- does it even matter to me?!?"
"Un, you want to let me see?"
"He—hell no! I am just asking if you are intentionally creating more trouble
for me!"
"Rest assured, Steph. I will use my [Additional measures] to appreciate and
feel your naked body later."
"—Wuh!"
Being told off like this, Steph blushed and covered her body.
But on the other hand, hearing the indication that Sora might have interest in
her allowed her a sense of "peace of mind".
Thinking that Sora was looking for a hole in the wall in which he could peek
through, Steph surveyed the room.
"But now, even if included — You can't blindly trust this [Mist block]."
"...........Huh?"
"Just like after my bath, my "little brother" would rise up, or the mist block is
too insufficient to block off my little sister, then that wouldn't be M18
[18]
, but
issued ban."
[19]
"—Th-this, ah.."
Steph didn't understand what Sora had just said.
But most importantly, Sora had no reason to peek over.
However, this was the limit of understanding that Steph has, which couldn't be
helped.
What was set in the bathroom were two mobile phones and laptops.
And Steph didn't know that the two tiny holes were cameras.
— After the bath, Shiro would confirm the screen, if there weren't any
problems, they would start watching.
So in Sora's heart, he swore to repress the impulse of wanting to go back to
that world.
Part 2
"Fuu......how comfortable......"
".....Muwuuu........hair slippery........very ticklish...."
While waiting for Shiro to finish, Sora hurriedly took a shower himself.
The seemingly refreshed Sora was in total contrast with Shiro's unhappy look.
—It appeared that, it was exactly what Sora had mentioned earlier, after
Shiro's white hair was being combed.
Her gently wavy hair, which was as white as snow, was drawn down.
Accompanied by that porcelain-like white skin and coupled with her red
eyes...she was just like a doll produced by a professional craftsmen.
"It would be fine if you'd remain in this state forever. Really, it's such a waste."
"....Anyways, apart from Nii.......won't show it."
Speaking of which, Sora did also have a hearty appearance after he shaved
his stubble.
How to say it.
(Wh-what a failure.....)
Staring intently at Sora, Steph desperately tried to suppress her nosebleed,
that.....
Currently, Sora did not have the vile feeling that he emitted out during their
first meeting, but instead had the hearty image of a [Good Youth].
However— The problems didn't stem from here.
Trying desperately to endure the forthcoming gushing nose bleed, Steph
blurted out.
"Y-you, both of you— get dressed!"
—Steph got so shocked that she stood up, while the siblings, with only towels
wrapped around themselves, replied.
"......Didn't you say you wanted to wash our clothes? We only have those
clothes to wear...unless they've already been dried?"
Said Sora, who didn't expect that dryers would exist in this world.
"Th-that, that.........then I will prepare you some clothes— male, do we have
male clothes to wear.......gu, guuuuu...................why did it end up like
this.........."
Grumbling, Steph turned around and left to search for clothes.
—10 minutes later.
The exact same location as before, Steph was currently kneeling on the
ground with her head down, deeply regretting what she had done.
(Wh-what a failure.....)
"Ho ho, this is a butler's uniform— the so-called [Tuxedo],
right..........although moving around in it is quite inconvenient, it's quite
interesting, like cosplay! And it matches with the white lining."
Standing in front of the drooping Steph, was a butler-dressed Sora.
"............Fluttering, too much. Inconvenient for movement......."
And Shiro who was wearing Steph's dress from when she was a child.

This was her satisfactory choice after searching for suitable clothes that would
fit both of them.
There was only the servant's clothes for the men— which was the butler's
uniform.
Similarly, for clothes suitable for an eleven year old girl, only the clothes that
she wore in the past could be acceptable.
The gesture of both siblings, were like of a highborn Ojou-sama with her
personal butler beside her.
Steph stole another glance again.
Probably because of his slender body and broad shoulders, the subtle butler
kind ofstyle perfectly matched Sora, which made Steph's heartbeat pound
furiously.
Looking at the little sister who looked like his master, Steph's heart clenched
for the third time.
"Really, a failure...."
"Hmm? What's wrong?"
"Nothing at all!"
Carelessly misspeaking out her inner anxiety, Steph hurriedly shook her head.
Patting on her knees that were still planted on the ground, Steph stood up.
But if this slender girl's mind could be easily perceived, then Sora did not
resent the eighteen years of being a virgin.
Whispering to himself.
"Slept, refreshed after a bath— Steph."
"Hm, ah, eh? Wh-what is it?"
"What are you panicking for. Erm....this house............this
building........castle?"
For the Tokyo-born Sora, he was unable to classify what Steph's "residence"
type was within his cognitive range, but he concluded that this was [Just fine].
"Does it have a library or a stack room where books can be accessed and
reviewed?"
"Ah, yes...............there i"Ah, yes...............there is one..........what are you going to do?"
"Steph, are your ears bad? Didn't I say I want to review the books?"
"Th-that of course I heard it! I am just asking what do you need to check!"
"Check what...........hmmm, naturally about all the things in this world."
"—[This World]?"
Steph was somewhat confused about these words that would normally come
out of inhabitants from a different world.
"......Nii, that.....we haven't told her yet."
Said Shiro with a dejected expression, seeming unwilling to accept her dried
hair.
"—Hmmm? That? Is that so?"
"Erm...I don't understand what you are saying?"
"Ah, how to explain this. This willfeel awkward explaining things now."
This kind of topic, whether if it was believed or not, could be said to be the
biggest obstacle.
Sora thought carefully on what he should say in order to gain trust.
—Scratching his head, he sighed.
It was obvious that Sora was showing a troubled expression.
Then, without affectation, he casually said,
"To put it simply, we are [From a different world]. So we want to acquire
knowledge of this world."
—Just like that.
Part 3
They were guided to the library— or what looked like one.
Almost the same proportions as a high school library, it was actually Steph's
[Private stack room].
Huge amounts of books filled the bookshelves that were neatly arranged
against the wall.
Although they wanted to investigate something—
"......Eh, Steph."
"Hmm? What is it?"
Sora unexpectedly ran into a huge obstacle.
"—The common language of this country, it isn't Japanese?"
Holding the book that was in a foreign language, Sora hugged his head and
groaned.
"Japanese? I don't quite understand, but the natural lingua franca for the
human species is [Human language]."
"Whoa............a really super, straightforward world."
Obviously there wasn't a problem with communicating.
Yet the text written in the book could not be identified.
".........Then, are you guys really from a different world?"
"Yeah, I know you'llfind it hard to believe—"
People wouldn't believe Sora's words, but rather think that it was a plot in a
story. Even Sora didn't expect to be trusted easily.
"Ah, no. On that point, I have never doubted it."
Hearing Steph's soft reply, Sora could not help but be stunned.
"Huh? Why?"
In return, the conversely shocked Steph also replied.
"You ask me why.......the Elves who possess high level magic were originally
summoned from another world, so this is not an eye-catching thing.
Moreover, looking at your appearance, it was certain that you were not
people of this country, but you could only be human........"
—After all, there was only one country left for mankind.
"Ahhh.......that's right~. This is a fantasy world after all~.......Fuu."
Seeming to be too paranoid, Sora sighed deeply.
Once again, he flipped through the foreign book and scratched his head.
"Hmmm........it is indeed troublesome to not be able to rely on our general
knowledge. Can you remember it...........Shiro?"
"........Un."
"How?"
".....Un."
Sora and Shiro.
They seemed to be exchanging information with a communication method
known only to the siblings.
Casting their line ofsight on the books, both of them fellsilent.
Unable to stand this awkwardness, Steph sighed.
"......So, what should I do?"
This time, she would probably have to [Contribute] and be a tutor for both of
them, which could not help but add a little self-deprecating flavor.
But, Sora who had moved his sight away from the book, proposed something
different.
"No. What I want is something different."
Hearing that, Steph suddenly remembered what had happened last night and
this morning, before assuming a defensive posture.
Even though Steph would not be surprised ifshe heard dozens of PervertedH
things coming from his mouth—
"Could you answer a few questions for me."
"— Okay.......ah, huh? That, no problem."
Hearing something unexpected yet serious, Steph stroked her chest in relief.
Putting on a serious face, Sora continued.
"Yesterday, when I groped your chest, you had no resistance, so why did you
hit me when I tried to flip your skirt, just why— okay, okay, I'll be serious,
that was just a joke........."
Feeling the penetrating gaze of Steph, Sora's gaze once again fell back onto
the book.
"Hmm, I often hear the words 'Human race', so what are the other 'Races',
then."
Looking like she had heard an incredible question, Steph rejoined.
"...........Is there only the human race in Sora's world?"
"Well, at least the only form of interaction we have should only be with that of
a [Human]— so?"
"Ah, guu.......this, eh...."
As they had claimed, they were not from this world, so what should be
clarified first. After considering this point, Steph began talking.
"Firstly— do you know about [God's words]?"
"How the [Ten Oaths] came into being? We heard it from some choir group
by the fountain not too long ago."
"I understand...— then— "
—Cough cough.
"The so-called [Races], for which the [Ten Oaths] were laid down for, are
the intellectual 【Sixteen Races】."
"Sixteen races......"
"With the [Ten Oaths] as the basis, the rights to encroach, violate, destroy,
and mutually killfor the 【Sixteen Races】— were all taken away, and the
result was, war disappeared from this world."
"......I see. And I was originally wondering where would the food come from
— but it turned out that the [Oaths] were only limited to intellectual life."
While flipping through the book, Sora felt quite satisfied with what he had
said.
Seeing this, Steph sighed and muttered 'How smart' in her heart, before
continuing.
"However, let's see, using games to determine ongoing wars. Which are also
territorial battles— 'Gambling for the country'. Even as we speak, someone
would most likely be playing this sort of game."
[Gambling for the country]— Sora had some reaction to this previously heard
phrase.
"—The human race's country is only left with Elchea, right?"
".........Currently, it is indeed true...........even though it was not said that other
races would have only one country— but for the human race, we are only left
with Elchea."
— Even till here.
Sora kept asking questions which he had already known the answers to.
And comparing with this world, their own world seemed to have more
common sense.
Which means,
"So if there is no war, why fight for territory? Can't interlocution solve
anything?"
".....Guu, that....."
But, Shiro replied instead of the halted Steph.
"...........Resources are limited...........as long as continuous propagation is
infinite........sharing will also be limited...............leading to common demise."
"Y-yeah. Just like that!"
Hearing the opinions of Shiro who had snatched her chance to speak, Steph
hurriedly nodded.
"........You...didn't even consider that before, right......."
Because Shiro answered first, Sora, who did not receive the perception a
resident this world might have, helplessly watched Steph.
"Wh-wh-what are you saying, this type of thing!"
—Indeed, she did perceive all of this as "common sense", since she was born
here after all.
So as for why the games were used to compete for this problem, it was going
to be difficult to answer when questioned.
".......In any case, this problem is quite similar to our world's too."
Sora sighed.
Even without [War], [Competition] still exists.
—Which also means, [Total equality] is unachievable.
If equality was equal to handing out limited chairs, then competing with each
other would be a game of [MusicalChairs].
And the results, the wealthy would be the [Minority] while the poor would be
the [Majority]—
What a pain, there was clearly nothing different between this world and their
world.......
"Then, what kind ofspecific races are there in the 【Sixteen Races】?"
Pausing all his thoughts, Sora got the topic back on track.
Steph hummed........like she was desperately trying to recall things, while
counting numbers using her fingers.
"Below only God, the first is the Divine Spirit race, then the second is the
Phantasma race, number three is the Elementals race— there is also the
Dragon and Giant race...........Elf and Werebeast race, erm— and so on."
"........Hmmmm, as expected of a benevolent fantasy world."
Steph seemed to have given up on reciting the sixteen races after reaching the
middle.
Facing against the weak-minded Steph, Sora suddenly remembered another
question.
"Hey, what are the [Number placings].........for?"
"Uh, that. I am not so sure myself, but it seemed to be some sort of ranking
sequence."
"— Ranking sequence?"
"Un, un, to say it simply, the level of their adaptive magic, which was what I
heard."
"What do you mean, what I heard...you are really ambiguous. Steph, did you
receive education?"
Disregarding his NEET identity, Sora asked to a seemingly unhappy Steph.
All the things he said, lead to a new topic, before coughing afterwards.
"First things first, I did~ I did graduate from college, okay?! And about this
ranking sequence, there was nothing to research about humans— because we
are number 16— which means that our magic adaptive level is 0. It couldn't
be observed no matter how hard you research about it."
".......0?"
Sora shifted his line ofsight away from the book and asked.
"Hmm—? Wait, humans can't use magic?"
"Yeah. Apart from that, we can't even perceive magic."
".............I feel like.............as long as you use props, wouldn't that do?"
"Games infused with magic could be played..........because the game itself
require magic to be driven— but magic for mankind is just impossible."
"—Absolutely?"
Although Sora kept firing annoying questions, Steph didn't show any sighs of
boredom. Actually, it would be better to say—
"Absolutely. Humans can't connect to the [Spirit Corridor]— which is the
source of magic."
Steph slightly lowered her head.
"That's why we are on a losing streak for [Gambling for the Country]......"
—Aaa.
With a slightly bitter smile, Sora went on.
".......Then, the most adept at using magic are? It really is the number one
right?"
"Ah, no. Being closer to number one, means being closer to becoming gods
— their existence could be regarded as a form of magic. But generally, for the
most adept in using magic, it would be the [Elf race] from number seven."
Elf. A typical impression crossed Sora's mind after hearing the word.
"—Elf........isn't an Elf...pointy eared, pale skin?"
Steph gave out an expression that clearly wondered how did residents from
another world know so much.
"Errr, yes. Now, the largest country in this world would be [Avant Heim], a
place that is driven by magic. But upon mentioning magic, the word could be
synonymous with the Elf race."
—Sora sighed with a 'Fuu'.
Placing his hand on his chin, Sora used a very serious expression and started
thinking.
"—"
Because Sora was decked out in a tuxedo uniform, in addition to his serious
face, Steph's heart started beating wildly.
(Illusion, illusion, illusion— these are only instilled feelings.)
Just when Steph's heart went into meditation, Sora seemed to have finished
his thoughts.
As if wondering about something, Sora carefully worded his reply.
"...........A race that can't use magic..........can't have a [Big country]?"
"Eh, ah, no, the Werebeast race from number 14 can't use magic either....."
Steph reluctantly and incoherently answered.
"But, what's different is, they can rely on their powerfulsenses to read the
magic atmosphere and people's feelings. The islands in the South-Eastern
seas are joined together as the Werebeasts' country, the [Eastern Union],
which is the world's third largest country—"
Steph painfully, and unconsciously increased the strength of her hand that was
clutching her arm, before continuing.
".......Even if they can't use magic, they can still compete with others— with
the exception of [Aylwin Gerudo], they can rival many races and nations. But
it doesn't really matter, because in a human's eyes, it would seem as if they
were using something similar to [Super powers] or [Super sensing]."
"—Aaaa. So that's how it is."
If humans can't even detect the usage of magic, wielding it would be
impossible.
A unilateral disadvantage where the opponent uses cheats that can't be
detected, of course humans can't win.
—If this was confirmed, then losing was natural.
"Hmmmmmm, there is such a thing, eh."
As if Sora had figured it out, he nodded strongly. But at the same time.
"......Nii—I memorized it."
Shiro's voice sounded.
"Oh, as expected of my little sister."
"..........Continue, praising me."
"Ohh, of course. As expected of my prided sister, so talented! Very
awesome."
Sora stood up and casually stroked Shiro's head, for which Shiro responded
by narrowing her eyes like a cat.
Steph did not understand what was going on and just stared at them, before
muttering.
".....Eh? Memorized what?"
"What are you asking about, of course the human language."
Shifting his sight to the amazed Steph, Sora casually said.
"But she really is incredible, eh. I still need a bit more time."
"......Nii, how slow.........."
"..........Huhuhu, for a man, compared to fast, slower is better right?"
"............Nii, how small."
"It, it's, it's, its not small!! On, on what basis—— Steph, are you okay?"
Steph was stunned just by listening to their conversation.
With her tone changed, she said.
"That......I didn't hear wrongly right? Did you all just— memorized a
language?"
"Well, yeah? So what?"
".......(Nods)."
"—In such a short time? Are you kidding me?"
Her face slightly twitched again to confirm it. But Sora breezily replied.
"This is nothing surprising. Since grammar and words are similar to dialogues,
won't memorizing the text settle everything."
"........Nii........that, you haven't memorized it yet."
"Finishing it in 10 minutes is too fast for your brother. Your brother isn't as
smart as you, I will probably still need one more hour. Oh yeah, how to read
this by the way. I can't seem to grasp the marking law—"
".......That, isn't........Japanese............use Latin grammar, to read it.........."
"No, I've thought about that already, but the syntax for the position of the
predicate is quite strange."
"...........Ancient Chinese............."
"Eh? So only the depiction part is in front! How annoying— ah, but now the
sentence is smooth."
"...........Nii, needs to master, more languages......"
"For you to learn eighteen different languages, it is already a special case. And
as for me, I am just a people person, six languages is already enough for me
to play games without encountering any difficulties."
—Steph implausibly listened to the siblings conversation.
But the siblings only had a casual look.
Both of them seemed to be taking her for granted, casually talking to each
other.
Language, also could communicate. As long as the text is memorized.
Arranging that sentence, it actually did indeed sound quite simple.
However, they didn't enumerate another important fact into their conscious
yet.
Which was—
[No one to teach], which also meant that what they did was not『Study』,
but『Interpret』.
Completing such a thing in a short time, yet they did not seem boastful.
(In, In their world— is this counted as normal?)
Both of them had already exceeded her comprehension of creatures.
Looking at the siblings that were not from this world, Steph felt a chill down
her spine.
However, at the same time, faint warmth started pouring out of her chest.
......Unless this is.
Unless she herself.
Are meeting people that have transcended humans.
And they are the ones— who will eventually change the people of this
country.
"— Hm? What's wrong?"
Aware of being stared at, Sora turned his head to face Steph, which heated
up her inner agitation even more.
"Eh, ah, no, that— I will, go make tea."
Steph hurriedly left the library in a panic, with her ears dyed red.
Puzzledly watching Steph leaving, Sora said.
".......What's wrong with her?"
But Shiro did not even give a glance to him and just continued reading the
book.
"......Nii, absolutely......doesn't know........a maiden's heart."
"— If I understood that, I would not have kept my virginity for 18 years
already. And what does a maiden's heart have to do with that?"
A scene where an eleven year old girl is preaching to an eighteen year old boy
about a maiden's heart.
Although men mature later than women..........
At least for this occasion, this saying was applicable.
".......Obviously, compared to Shiro..........better, at reading others
feelings........"
Shiro whispered, and that boast made Sora look triumphant.
"In games, this would reflect my ability, but in reality, reading a person's mood
is a completely different thing."
That analogy to compare games and the so-called female— No, "so-called
human".....
Just like a galge, where tens of thousands of time-limited options would jump
out every second.
Facing that kind of impossible game that generate their own ideas was of
course not natural.
—But, that matter does not matter right now.
"Okay......"
Under Shiro's help, Sora was finally able to understand the human language.
He read an entire book to confirm his results.
After closing the hardcover book with a 'Pata!'
A serious face began showing.
"Okay— Shiro."
".......Un."
"You are aware of it already right."
"......Un."
The siblings were communicating in a language that only the both of them
understood.
Sora, unconfidently and with little insight, asked.
"— What do you think?"
But Shiro closed her eyes and replied.
"........Shiro—Willfollow.....Nii."
Slightly opening her eyes, and showing the usual deadpan look, Shiro
dismissively said.
".......Just like that promise—no matter, where."
—Promise, yes.
Father brought a [Little sister] from the previous marriage—Shiro.
The amazing little sister who was a born talent.
And a brother whose innate mind was horrible.
Because of the erraticness, both of them complemented each other better
than realsiblings.
Eventually, even both parents abandoned them.
Without any friends nor companions, a promise was forged between them.
—Because of being too capable, the little sister was misunderstood by others.
—Because of being too incapable, the brother was good at reading others.
To make up for the shortcomings, the ten year old [Brother] from then made
an proposal.
And the three year old [Little sister] that was capable of multiple languages,
nodded and pinky swore.
Stroking the head of his [Little sister].
Since then, for eight years—
The little sister who would follow her shameless brother— Shiro.
However, a brother who did not even take her out of the room— Sora.
If it wasn't a regret, then it was.....
"In short— compared to [That world], this side is much more interesting
right?"
He stared at the distant horizon where a chessboard was faintly visible.
Taking out his phone, Sora started the schedule planner.
Part 4
Steph watched as the boiling water sounded with a 'Gulou Gulou'.
Needless to say, when boiling tea leaves, the temperature for the water is
extremely important.
Accompanying the tea were pancakes made yesterday.
It had been too long since the human territory last had sugar, so snacks were
thoroughly lacking.
She could only use cinnamon as a replacement for sugar for the pancakes,
which she made, full of confidence.
—The tea, with the sliced pancakes, were placed on the tray.
"......Okay, there should be no more problems."
Feeling a sense of accomplishment, Steph gently wiped the sweat off of her
forehead for a job well done.
"Erm, Ojou-sama."
As if waiting for the chance to approach her, the maids asked Steph.
"Ah, what is it?"
"No.....sorry for our rudeness, but Ojou-sama, what are you doing?"
".........Indeed, you are very rude. Why the sudden question?"
"No, that........if you had just commanded us, we, the maids, would have
prepared the tea and snacks, but you wordlessly did it on your
own.................and you seem to be desperately trying to do it well......."
——……………….
A-re?
Hearing that, she wondered: why did she make the tea with her own hands?
Raising such a question for herself, a scenario started appearing in her head.
[Whoa. How delicious. Steph, you're really good at housework, aren't you.]
Just like that, Sora would hold the teacup in one hand and smile.
——…………Puu, dee.
Blood started filling Steph's face.
"——AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH, what the helllllllllllllll!!"
Shouting this, Steph headbutted the wall.
"Why do I have to personally make snacks to prove my own housework
prowess! That man, it would've been enough to just give him that water over
there— and that rock, plus the weeds!"
"Oj-Ojou-sama! Please calm down!"
"Ch-chief maid! Oj-Ojou-sama's mentality is unstable—!"
The maid hurriedly stopped Steph from producing more of the 'bang bang
bang' sounds, falling into a state of chaos.
Part 5
"........Ah~......"
Sighing sadly, Steph walked in the hallway while carrying a silver tray.
On the tray, there were 2 portions— which was the tea and refreshments that
were prepared for the siblings earlier.
Once again failing to overcome her feelings, Steph personally prepared the
items meant for them while sighing again.
Self-loathing, but at the same time, the thought ofseeing Sora enjoying the
food and praising her—
".............Can't deny that I am a little bit expectant.........heh."
However.
Steph suddenly stopped moving.
"Wait a moment, Steph. This food, will it suit the taste ofsomeone from a
different world?"
Steph was confident with her tea and cooking techniques.
But, the receivers were not from this world.
"Ah—darn it—"
Another scenario swept past her mind.
『Whoa, sorry, but I'll pass on this one』
Sora blubbled with a wrinkly face.
"Ahhhhhhhhh.......is, isn't that bad, the retreat route ofsaying『this was made
by the maids』had disappeared already— erm, what kind of retreat route is
that! No matter what they think, I don't really care— no! Ahhhhhhh
Really..............this, is definitely a curse......"
Getting completely caught in a state of confusion and helplessness.
Taking a deep breath, she started organizing her thoughts to search out an
excuse.
"Ye-yes. Not only being taken as a fool, if I can't even make one cup, or one
piece ofsnack, this would tarnish the Dora's family reputation. But this is
unquestionably tasty, it must be the cultural difference if it was disliked—
yeah, this excuse— this"
Chattering everything out.
While reciting out the excuse, with both hands that were in an empty state,
she struggled to open the stack room's door.
"—A-re?"
—Surveying everywhere, the figure of the siblings weren't there.
Wind that came from an unlocked balcony door near the front stairs blew
against the curtain slightly.
Arriving to the balcony.......Steph found the siblings there.
The butler-dressed brother was currently leaning on the balcony, taking a
picture of the street with his phone.
The little sister that was a reminiscent of a white-haired Ojou-sama— leaned
against her brother while reading a book.
—The duo that was always together, wouldn't surprise anyone if they died
due to separation.
Seeing the pair in a picturesque scene— and their relationship.
Her heart started to clench, but Steph reminded herself that it was just a
misconception.
".......What a bustling street."
Watching the commotion outside, Sora said.
"—Yeah. The selection for the king's position is still ongoing."
Replying, Steph placed the tray on the table that was on the balcony, and
started pouring the tea.
".......That.......please enjoy."
"Ah, thanks."
"Little sister should drink one too."
".......Un."
The initial impression—was a city of a『Typicalfantasy world』— but now it
was slightly different.
— Due to the prohibition of war, the city was not damaged in any way.
The various buildings that resembled Romanesque architecture, classical
architecture and Baroque architecture were intertwined.
The road was paved with bricks, a wagon was walking up link, and a barque
was docked on the harbor not far away.
It looked like even steam engines had not been invented.
Even more distant away, was a range of terraced hills, with the agricultural
practices using a style that was more ancient than this city.
—If war did not happen, this scene would be the perfect reflection of it.
Ironically, 『Chemistry』was accelerated during the war, so that fertilizer and
fuel was dependent of technology to significantly leap forward.
Then again, the books seen in Steph's library were almost entirely written by
hand— manuscripts.
Probably typography wasn't invented yet or it was still not popularized.
"Renaissance of the Medieval Europe. Or probably before being
contaminated by the industrialrevolution.............what a beautiful city."
".............Copied references...........from strategy game..............you worked
hard."
—But, Sora thought.
According to God's words, the great war where the celestial body turned this
into a scorched earth, was probably thousands of years ago.
That is to say, since the conclusion of the『Oaths』, it had been a few thousand
years already.
And [Human kind] who was incapable of using any magic.
The same constitution as the [Human] in their original world.
After thousands of years, their world level was stillstuck in the early fifteenth
century.
—How about those racial civilization that could use magic to cheat, what was
their situation.
Sora suddenly asked.
"Ne, Steph—you, why do you want to be the King?"
"—Ah?"
"I heard that its because you will no longer be royalty, and that you were
desperately trying to disprove this rumor."
Sora recalled back what he heard in the Inn cum Tavern. But.
"—That, it doesn't matter anymore."
—In the final analysis, rumors are rumors. One laugh and it would be over.
She stood next to Sora and overlooked the street view.
"—This country— Elchea, is considered pretty big right?"
Looking into the distance— past the normal line ofsight, she continued.
"In the past, the world had several human countries. And Elchea was
considered it's largest."
Prideful, yet self-depreciative, she continued.
"But since the introduction of the『Ten Oaths』, this had become the sole『Last
country』for mankind already."
"......."
"It looks very lively right? But............Elchea is moving towards the path of
destruction."
Once again looking at the hustle and bustle of the street, but this time her
expression was depressing.
Following the line ofsight, Sora easily imagined it out.
Losing territory, a small country with a huge population.
Lack of resources and food would eventually lead to economic stagnation.
Wanting to produce food, yet no land to do so, and with no outputs, there
would be no labor positions.
Although the order made by the『Ten Oaths』was stable,
—He thought of the time when he arrived in this world, ganged up by a group
of thieves.
Sora gazed towards the direction of the cliff.
Shiro who was leaning on her brother's leg and reading a book, browsed
towards Steph.
"The previous king— my Ojii-san, lost the gambling for country, forcing him
into an impasse, which was the capital. With the humans on a losing streak,
the situation would keep deteriorating....."
Clenching her fist, Steph bit down on her lip.
"Accused of being stupid, yet still thinking ofsaving the country, wasn't wrong
in anyway—"
—If land was not taken back, humans won't be able to multiply indefinitely.
Rather than waiting for its demise, it was better to find a way out from this
poor environment—was it.
"I—want to save Elchea...."
Steph was trying to fight back her tears.
"Prove to everyone that Ojii-san wasn't wrong—the continuation of the
human kind..........actively take the offensive to recapture territories, otherwise
in the near future, humans willreally be extinct."
—This sentence came out painfully from Steph.
With her usual expression, Shiro indifferently asked.
"……Steph.....like.........this country, this world?"
"Un un—of course!"
—Smiling with tears.
Steph promptly answered.
However, in contrast with her actions, both siblings lowered their heads.
".........How great, ah......."
"..........Yeah, it really is enviable that one could assert it out."
But—Sora used a calm, yet indefensible tone of voice.
And shattered the glimmer of hope that Stephanie Dora had.
"But that sort of wish cannot be accomplished."
"—Wuh...."
"And, to say something worse—"
He got close to the speechless Steph and attacked(Verbally).
"Your grandfather—right here right now, I willsay he is the worst foolish
king."
—…………
Looking like she was trying hard to squeeze out words, Steph opened her
mouth after the long silence.
"—Wh-Why.......would you think so?"
Biting her lips, the feeling of nails digging into the flesh of her palm could be
felt.
.......If violence wasn't prohibited in this world, those words would have
rewarded a slap across Sora's face. Even so, Steph was stillfuming mad and
angrily remarked.
Obsessed with him—no.
No matter how strong the mandatory of falling in love is, she could not forgive
such verbal abuse.
But for this question, Sora sighed and took a photograph using his phone.
Reminiscent of the European city from the fifteenth century.
No reasons to go to war, the old and new buildings mixed together, showing
a beautiful city.
However, precisely because of this—remorse could be felt.
"If this goes on—this country will perish. At the same time the selection of the
new King is going on."
The unexpected phrase came out.
Using a hysterical tone, the confused Steph retorted.
"Wh-Why would you say that! Precisely because this wasn't supposed to
happen that the selection of King was created."
The somewhat helpless Sora and Shiro lifted their heads to look at the sky.
A different shade of grey from what they were familiar with, like the color of a
spilled blue ink, a generally blue sky.
—Then, both of them thought of the things when they had just arrived.
The words that "God" said to them.
All decisions decided with a simple game, the world similar to a chessboard,
[Dischord].
My—
Shiro's—
—A dream world
—New lease of life—world.
".......Steph, when will this gambling assembly end?"
Although Steph did not accept the words said previously and looked
unhappy, she stillreplied.
"—Today is the last day."
Setting her line ofsight on the eastern side, what looked to be a King's city.
"In the evening, the last game will be played in the hall, if there are no people
who would raise objections to the final victory, then the victor will be the new
king.........is there any problem?"
Closing the book with a 'Pata', Shiro stood up.
Stretching his waist, Sora patted his cheeks.
"—Yosh! Eh, little sister."
"......Un."
"No matter what your brother does, will you follow?"
"Un."
"Instantaneous reply eh. And I was prepared for some struggling to—"
".......Liar."
"Hm?"
"......Nii, looks........very happy."
As expressionless as usual.
A smile could be seen through the sights of Sora.
"—Haha, busted by you right?"
Ending it, both of them turned and went.
"Hey, wait, where are you going!?"
"King City."
"—Aa?"
Seemingly not being able grasp what Sora had said, Steph sent out a silly
voice.
However, not minding that, Sora continued walking.
"I am going to prove that your grandpa was right."
"——Aa?"
Sensing that Steph was hastening from behind.
Sora confirmed the matters in his phone's schedule planner.
—『Target』—In any case, become the King first.
Showing a wry smile, Sora pocketed his phone.
"Rarely obtaining a new world, it would be troublesome to come to a place
where it keeps losing."
"............(Nods)(Nods)."
"Then let's go be king, and snatch back the territories."
—Was that misheard?
Stephanie Dora tried to carefully confirm what was said earlier.
Then, when it was confirmed that she had not misheard, she looked at the
man's back.
A relaxed tone as if going out to buy something.
But wanting to confirm a piece of matter, the rebellious self-confidence and a
sense of trust—
The man's back that declared that he was going to recapture the territory of
humanity.
"Ah, right."
Grabbing the snack from the balcony table, Sora stuffed it into his mouth.
"—Ah"
Facing towards Steph who had forgotten that the snack was even there,
"Un, delicious. The refreshments were all delicious. Thank you!"
Turning his head around, he smiled towards himself.
Her heartbeat increasing violently, was it because of the [Oath]?
Even Steph was not sure of that now.
Chapter 3: - Expert/Expert
Part 1
Evening— King City, Elchea. The hall.
At the time when the majority of the crowd had already believed that the
selection of the king was coming to a conclusion.
In front of the throne, a small table and two chairs facing opposite sides
around it were placed.
The spectators that packed the hallfocused their attention on one of the
seated people.
—Leaning against the table, expressionlessly crossing her arms, wearing a
black veil draped over her head, resembling a mourning shawl, exuding an
aura as ifshe were dead, was a tall black haired girl—
Yes........the one who cheated to eliminate Steph— that girl.
An old man whose appearance matched that of a high ranking officialsaid.
"—Then, this person— Kurami Zierh remains victorious in the
election...........are there any other challengers?"
Although there was lots of noise and clattering in the hall, evidently there was
no one with the look of a challenger.
That was normal— a girl who had won all the games so far— Kurami.
By now, those who believed that someone could still defeat her didn't exist
anymore.
Kurami closed her eyes to this fact, and added a non-emotionalfeeling to her
original deadpan expression.
Since it was like this, the old man added.
"—Then, complying with the previous king's last words, Kurami-sama— will
become the new king of Elchea. If you have any objections, please stand up.
Otherwise, remain silent—"
"Ah, yes, yes. I disagree. I disagree, I disagree~!"
The phrase resounded throughout the hall, interrupting the old man. The
black-haired girl— Kurami, opened her eyes.
All eyes in the noisy hall converged at the direction from which the sound
came from.
A butler, along with a white-haired girl— Sora and Shiro, stood up and
raised their hands.
"Yes, yes. I have an objection, we both have an objection."
".......Un."
"........Who's that?"
With her blank expression, Kurami's line ofsight fell behind the two people.
"—Stephanie Dora's..........servants?"
Standing behind those two was Stephanie, whose shoulders were shaking.
Still devoid of expression, yet with a slightly mocking tone, she said.
"—Because you lost to me and couldn't be eligible for the election, you sent
servants? It's really a shameful act, isn't it........."
However, towards Kurami who sent an undisguised look of contempt.
Sora only smiled and replied while walking to her.
"Ahahaha, that sentence, you're not in any position to say that."
"—What do you mean, eh."
"Aiyah, but in fact, I don't really give a damn for this troublesome selection for
the king's throne, it's not my cup of tea oh."
Sora scratched his head, saying the same things that could be known as
annoying. Kurami narrowed her eyes.
"..........In that case, can you please disappear? This is not a place where you
can play around with children."
Sora started laughing— with a "But ah", he narrowed his eyes.
"It's not good to give a vacated throne to someone who『is a cheater that
borrows strength from other countries』right?"
The city interior started stirring up due to this sentence.
— Strength from other countries? — what is that? However, those chattering
were filtered out.
With sound audible only to Shiro, Sora whispered.
"—Is it there?"
What was on Shiro's hand, was the phone Sora used to shoot yesterday at
the bar.
Identifying the photo displayed on the screen, there were people who were
recognizable in this hall.
".........Four persons"
Shiro answered.
"Aside from that— the guy who hid his ears?"
"One person."
"Bingo. Then point her out with this current opportunity."
".......Un."
Steph leaned forward and asked the siblings who were currently discussing.
"Hey.............this, what is going on? What thing about other country's
strength?"
Steph quietly whispered in Sora's ear, and Sora replied to her clueless
expression,
"You still don't get it? Well, for example? For example—"
It turned loud.
"Conspiring with elves, using magic to achieve total victory to become the
next king, and finishing this country once and for all!"
Fear started to mingle with the commotion in the hall.
Gazing at this scene, Sora confirmed that no one had really noticed this truth.
"...............But then, ifsuch a major problem wasn't even noticed, perhaps the
defeat of the human species is a natural outcome."
"—Ne, you."
Kuramistood up while saying that and walked towards Sora.
The expressionless face that was concealed by the veil exuded out a unique
sense of coercion.
"Are you trying to say that I used magic to cheat?"
"Don't be like that, didn't I say『For example』? Or did I really hit the mark?"
However, that sense of coercion wasn't even acknowledged in the slightest.
Sora carefreely ignored that kind of pressure, and still carried a very blatant
provocation. This should be based on what he has absolute confidence in.
"—Okay. Since you have a disagreement, I'll take it as you want to play a
game now?"
"Fineeee~. It's a great help for you to do that~♪ But—"
Then, Sora interrupted Kurami who was just about preparing the poker
cards.
"Since it is a poker game— wouldn't it be better if you could dismiss those
facilitators over there right?"
Afterwards, as if responding to Sora's smile, Shiro stretched her fingers.
The commotion suddenly calmed down, and the attention of the crowd
became concentrated on the direction of that finger.
Kurami— and the man pointed, started twitching in their faces.
That small and relative change— was easily seen as a sufficient lethal point.
"— What are you talking about eh?"
"Ah, really? Then, could someone take down that person's hat?"
Even though the accused man took a step back, the surrounding audience
eventually removed his hat.
Two ears were exposed.
—Often seen in fantasy stories— yes, the long ears of elves.
Is, Isn't that guy from the elf race?
Chatter chatter.
Hey hey........then, it really was exactly what that guy said—
Chatter chatter.
That bitch, used magic-oriented cheats?
"Aye aye, this glamorous and beautifulfraud master, can you go and assist
your friend?"
Ridiculed by Sora, Kurami's expression remained undaunted.
"—Don't let me reiterate again and again, I don't understand what you are
trying to say."
"Ah~really.Then throwing him out would create no problems right?"
Grinning, Sora waved his hands with a 'Hush hush' as if trying to drive out that
elf-like man.
After that, he turned to face Kurami again, and retrieved out another one—
Shiro's phone.
"Okay, then we should start playing the poker now right, no problems right?"
While holding the cellphone to use, Sora laughed and said.
—A few seconds ofsilence
Kurami with her usual deadpan, shut her eyes and said.
"—I see, you are thinking that I'm having a collusion with that elf who god
knows came from where, pushing me into some kind ofstandpoint alike of an
[Enemy of humanity] who made use of magic............is that right?"
"Ah, a splendid rhetorical question. Or, you are prepared already?"
Kurami, upon hearing the further provocation from Sora,
"—However, I also have dignity here."
Remaining in her unreadable expressionless face, she cast a sight from
beneath her veil, as if to penetrate through Sora.
"If you wish, you may chase off that elf to wherever you like. Then— we
won't let any cheat to intervene, and demonstrate our true strength by
deciding a showdown using games."
But that proposal was exactly what Sora had envisioned, so he smiled
frivolously and said.
"Well~ Article 5 of 『Ten Oaths』, the challenged party has the right to decide
the contents of the game—however, why do you have to give up on poker
this time, and I'm being really gentle for not getting to the bottom of that♥"
Saying that, he aimed the phone's camera at Kurami, taking a picture with a
'Kacha'
"Hmm, you really aren't photogenic ah? It would be more lovely if you could
smile a little."
Finishing, Sora showed the display screen to Kurami.
What he got back was a glare filled with killing intent, but Sora merely made
eye contact with her without faltering
—An observant eye that could see through anything
Kurami, felt faint chills circulating in her body—.
Part 2
Kuramisuggested the most suitable game to be brought from her house that
could demonstrate one's true strength.
She simply said "Please wait a moment", before abruptly leaving King city.
On the other hand, Sora and the others were in the castle's atrium, waiting
while being bathed in sunset.
Sitting on a bench, both Sora and Shiro fiddled with their phones while
awaiting.
Glancing around from time to time.
Confirming that there was no one in the vicinity, Steph excitedly inquired
Sora.
"—The, then, I, I was being cheated with magic right!?"
".......Your, voice, too loud."
Steph was carrying an "I did not understand" kind of expression.
—But, she finally understood the truth behind the cheat that defeated her.
Moreover, the cheat had some involvement with magic, so towards this point,
it was comprehensible to her.
However, Sora who was considering something else, replied absently.
"Yeah, yes.......but to be more accurate, it was the magic used by a third
person who was the elf."
"Wha- what kind of magic was it?"
In the end, what kind of magic was used,
In addition, the only human who saw through that facade was Sora.
Moreover, the two were constantly concerned about the tools they were
manipulating.
Tools from a different world— maybe it could detect the usage of magic?
Waiting for the answer with expectant eyes, the reply Sora gave to Steph
was.
"Who knows? I have absolutely no clue."
—This answer that completely did not live up to her expectations.
Ignoring the dismayed and silent Steph, Sora dismissively replied.
"This was indeed a clever cheat. Back in the pub, I noticed that during the
battle with that guy, the hand that she collected was just too obvious. Shiro
and I immediately spotted that out."
"......Was Shiro, who noticed that."
"What a fussy little sister eh...........but it doesn't matter."
—Yesterday, on the first floor of the hotel/tavern.
Outside the tavern, in the midst of the poker game between Steph and
Kurami.
Coincidentally playing poker too, similarly using cheat, Sora was convinced of
his assertions towards the game inside.
However—
"If you want to ask me how that happened, I certainly have no reason to
know. After all, I know nothing about things related to magic."
"........"
Listening to the casualremark from Sora, Steph's half-opened mouth was
frozen.
"Ahh, magic is really powerful eh. If『Memory tampering』or『Rewriting the
fold』can't be proven, then winning is impossible. If humans can't perceive
magic, then they can only be aware of it when it comes down to their gut
feeling."
"—Wait"
Resurrecting from the petrochemicalstate, Steph shook her head and asked.
"Wait a moment, then how are we going to win!"
"Huh? It's impossible to win."
Facing Sora who would rather assert, Steph became speechless once again.
"It will be weird if you could win when dueling with those kinds of opponents.
The words are merely『Doomed to failure』— won't even have a chance to
win in one in a million."
But, Steph recovered again and started shouting, with Sora adding more
words in.
"So that's why we have to avoid it."
"—Eh?"
Steering his body to face Steph, Sora continued.
"Listen carefully, I am going to describe it as simple as possible."
"Guuu, okay...."
"Firstly, regarding this take turns in fighting one opponent to tire him out kind
of king election, the winner will be the representative of the human species."
"Yeah....."
"But this kind of proposal is flawed. Because there will be lots of leeway for
other countries."
"—Guu. Indeed that's the case ....."
Being pointed something that Steph didn't even realise, she unwillingly set her
gaze away.
—Yes. Using an unconditional method like 'take turns in fighting one
opponent to tire him out' to determine the electoral law.
If other countries help humans who can't sense magic to win, a puppetry
government would be completed.
Humans would completely lose and eventually perish.
Full of loopholes, a folly solution.
"—Which also means this is not an individual battle. But a national, diplomatic
war. OK?"
"Ah, so it's like that.......I get it."
"So, it is the elf......right? Although those group of guys want a human puppet
to be elected as king— but to be able to think so complicatedly to this
degree, you don't think that the elves are the only species involved right?"
"—Th-that...."
"The other countries are considering the same thing, whether the first
implementation has been taken in account, we won't know, but it is a very
high probability."
Then—
"We willfrom this point onwards, change their mindset, making them think
that we are [Also the same as humans]."
Playing with his cellphone, Sora let out a mischievous smile.
"Owning equipment that humans can't possibly have, looking as if the device
was used to detect the magic, naturally the person will be instantly disqualified
if magic was debunked. Furthermore, the key performer has already been
suspected and driven out—"
"The, then— suggested a battle under no influence of cheating right!"
A smiling face started appearing on Steph, but Sora only furrowed his brows,
before drooping his shoulders and saying.
"—You ah, to what degree is your naivety."
"Wh, why am I suddenly lectured!?'
"Did you hear what I said? Involvement from other countries is within their
expected range. Which is to say, they would naturally put into account the
sudden emergence of people like me right?"
"Ah...."
Then, with his thoughts back to the place where he originally premeditated,
Sora said.
"—It's safe to assume that the enemy is prepared. Preparing something that
even in this case, can also implement the smooth use of cheats."
........
Suddenly, because of Steph's words, Sora acted as if he thought ofsomething
and quickly added.
"Steph, do you remember that the human species can't use magic, but can
play with『Magic-driven games』right?"
"Ah, yeah..."
As if pondering on the answer, Sora exposed a candid expression.
"You also said that『Elf are the most adept at using magic』right. So you might
never have guessed that in response to other countries competitions that have
technologies able to detect magic, they will embed an even more complex and
less prone to be discovered magic into a game right— I'm afraid that she is
going to get『That』."
However, that sentence dulled down Steph's expression.
".......Then, if that happens. Wouldn't it make things much more difficult for
you?"
"—Huh? Why?"
"Eh? Because if it was a complex magic—"
This question has been repeated a couple of times already, Sora sighed yet
again.
"I said— towards us humans who are too pure,『Memory
tampering』and『Visualreading』those kinds of pure magic are humans greatest
threat, after all, there is no way to detect it. But if you are going to use a game
that is the same as gambling for the country, that kind of magic won't be
used."
Which also means, a game that appears on the [Surface].
But the fact is that it is included with an overwhelming advantage for the user.
And being unable to perceive it— interference won't be made from the
outside party.
Most likely, an absolutely beneficial cheat will be set up.
But, the constant『Victory』like when challenging Steph will cease to exist.
In order to allow them to come up with that plan.
For that purpose, the phone was used.
Now, everything was going according to their ways.
".......Bu, but."
Suddenly, as if understanding, Steph uttered the right opinion.
"Even so—you can't change the『Overwhelming disadvantage』right?"
"Ah, yeah. Is there a problem with that?"
But, Sora answered without a care, sitting on the bench while hugging Shiro,
he replied.
"As long as it is a game that can be won in theory, for 『 』, losing is
impossible."
"...........Un."
Just when Shiro had won against the chess application installed in her phone
set in the highest difficulty, she endorsed by nodding.
.....—At this time.
As if noticing something, Shiro turned her head.
From the approaching silhouette—it was Kurami who had spent a
considerable amount of time making them wait.
"........No good, did she overhear our conversation just now."
Sora murmured to Shiro in a voice audible to her only, in which she
responded by nodding her head.
—[Don't worry], was what it was implied to be.
As if affirming her answer, the first word that Kuramispoke out was,
"—I'll be straightforward and ask. You spies, where are you from?"
Sora felt relief in his heart, but prevented it from showing on his face, merely
laughing as he replied her.
"Ah, yes, in fact, we are from some country— oi, do you really think I would
say that? Are you an idiot?"
"—I will not hand over this country."
"I already know oh? Because you want to give it to the elves right~~"
"..Wrong."
Sora laughed while throwing out provocations, but Kurami's serious
expression was in strong denial.
"I won't hand it to anyone. Imanity's country, belongs to Imanity alone."
"—Oh?"
For an [Oh, what an unexpected answer], Sora urged her to continue saying,
in which Kurami complies by asserting.
"Using the elf's strength is to ensure the survival circle of Mankind—although
you can't possibly imagine what a complex contract I had to exchange to
achieve this motive........and to when it is necessary to hand over the territory
— I willsever all ties with the elves."
—Whoa.....
Even if it's Sora, he can't help it but have a mood as if embracing his head.
With a wry smile, she said words that came from her heart
"Exposing the plan and suspecting the elf as a spy, are you an idiot? Do you
want to die?"
But, the confidence conveyed through Kurami's eyes could be seen through
the veil, staring at Sora.
".............No matter which country's spy you are from, you can never win
against me oh?"
"Oh.........such great confidence you have there."
"But I'm just telling the truth oh. This world's biggest country 『Aylwin
Gerudo』—an impenetrable fortress that even the magicalrace like elfs can't
even win. Precisely because of this, it was known as the "Largest country",
having an engagement with it is surely defeat, without an exception."
.......Un.
".........I'm a human—"
Relaxing her serious gaze, Kuramisaid while looking at Sora's eyes.
"I'll advise you, if you still have some heart for this country, for the sake of
Imanity, I hope you will give up on your spy task and stop this fight. I swear
that I am definitely not the puppet of the elves."
"......."
Facing the words which sounded like a plea, Sora did not utter a word.
"—Unable to use magic, even perceiving it is impossible—us humans."
Her face covered by the black veil, Kurami hinted out an expression of
unwillingness.
"If you want to survive in this world—it can be achieved by living under the
shelter of a country and obtaining『Rights to live』, then abandoning the victory
or defeat and close up. You understand me?"
....Oh.
Complying to the ten oaths, the challenged party has the right to decide the
contents of the game.
Indeed, borrowing strength from the strongest species could certainly get a
territory.
Rejecting all games and practising isolation was the most efficient and
effective strategy.
Able to obtain nothing else, at the same time, able to keep everything else.
It's just like chess, where the strongest line up is on hold.
However, towards these words—
"............Un, so that's how it really is.........it's definitely not a bad plan. I have
known this already......:"
"Then, you willsurrender right......"
As if in gratitude, Kurami closed her eyes—
"However,
"I reject!"
Blurting out these words caused her eyes to widen in response.
"—Reason......could you tell me why?"
"Hehe, that's because....."
Sora hugged his little sister who was watching with an expression that could
not be discerned.
"One of our most favorite things for 『 』is—"
""Standing in a position where the opponent has an advantage and
deny it with a 『NO』!""
Like a chorus, both Sora and Shiro combined together.
Originally unclear of the plot, Steph and Kurami could not arrange this
reasoning properly.
Only looking at the excited siblings while feeling stunned.
"Wahaha!『I always wanted to try and say the number four lines
[20] 』—and I
really said it out!"
".......Nii, very, goodjob."
Seeing the siblings raising a thumbs up, Kurami's shoulders started to tremble.
Was it a provocation, or simply no room for any more negotiation.
"—Looks like I have wasted my time. I will beat you down with the power
you so desire to fight...........I'll be waiting in the hall."
"Yes~~yes~~. Go and prepare『the borrowed power that people fawn over
』"
While watching her leave, Sora deliberately threw out some offensive words.
"Is, is that alright? What she said, I think there is some truth in it......"
"—About that, I think it's time for you to [suspect others] right?"
Sora said while putting up his finger.
"One, where is the basis for the verified claims she is saying."
"Ah...."
Feeling slightly embarrassed as she understands it, Steph shyly lowered her
hear. Ignoring her actions, Sora put up his second finger and continued.
"Two, ifshe really has the means to win, then why did she bother coming here
to persuade us into abandoning our duel?"
"......Ah!"
Probably noticing the key points, Steph raised her head.
"To lessen the chance of her failing.............use the means to win without
having to duel—!?"
That is to say— the expected result Sora had thought.
Getting a rare answer that was correct from Steph, Sora smiled while putting
up his third and fourth fingers.
"Three, even if what she said was true, she can't disclose that sort of
information to people who are suspected to be spies from other country. And
lastly, we are finished if they figured out our playing cards, ok?"
Greatly opening her mouth, Steph could not help but nod excessively.
"So, so careful consideration was put in before saying those words eh......."
.......Of course Steph wouldn't know about the plot.
Gazing at Sora with candor, she realised her cheeks were flushed and
panickingly shook her head.
However, Sora was staring at the direction where Kurami left— the passage
that leads straight to the hall of King City.
"......But then, it doesn't end like that. That fellow—is similar to you."
Shifting his gaze to Shiro.
With a nod, Shiro took steps to move forward.
"—A bit, she underestimates us humans."
Part 3
Returning to the hall.
What greeted their eyes was a large audience filling the hall, who had
probably been waiting the whole time.
And then in front of the throne there stood a small table, and a pair of chairs.
On top of the table was—
"A chessboard...?"
This time—the one confused was Sora. An unfair game infused with the elves'
magic... He had considered many possibilities but—chess was outside of his
imagination. After all—how exactly do you cheat in chess? Sora was
concerned about this being slightly out of his expectation. However Kurami
sat in one of the chairs, and in a monotonous voice explained.
"Yes, chess. But this is not just normal chess."
Saying this she took out a small box, and scattered the pieces on the board.
—Then.
The 32 pieces, 16 each of black and white, each moved into position by
themselves, as ifsliding on the board.
It was as if—
"That's right, this is chess where 'the pieces have their own wills'."
As if reading Sora's thoughts, Kurami answered.
"The pieces move automatically. Just give a command, and the pieces will
move according to the command."
"...I see. That's how it'll be, huh."
—She brought a troublesome game.
Sora thought through the possible ways she could cheat in his mind, and
clicked his tongue.
"...What do we do, Shiro."
If it were regular chess, then Shiro would definitely win.
But that was only if it were regular chess.
Not to mention that the opponent had definitely put in some magic, intending
to cheat.
"...Don't worry, if it's chess... I can't lose."
Saying this, Shiro boldly walked forward.
—But, before that, Sora confirmed.
"Hey, it's fine if we switch in the middle right?"
""—?""
The ones surprised were Kurami, as well as Shiro.
"Unfortunately, the two of us here are one player. Also, that seems to be a
game that only one side is familiar with. It's to even the playing field, right?"
While playing with his cellphone Sora said. As if trying to read his intentions,
Kuramistared into Sora's eyes. However, it didn't seem like she managed to
learn anything from Sora's eyes.
—Someone like that won't ever be equal to even one of 『 』's wings.
"—Do as you please."
Concerned about the cellphone in Sora's hands, or is it that she was alert
since she couldn't read anything from him. Kuramisaid, as ifspitting out the
words—but.
"...Nii, do you think, Shiro will...?"
Unexpectedly protesting—was what was supposed to be the other wing, his
sister.
"Shiro, you're being too hotheaded. If it were regular chess then there's not
even a 10000 to 1 chance that you'd lose."
"...Nn."
Shiro nodded as if that was obvious.
Sora, too, was as serious as could be. There was no way she would lose.
—However.
"This is not just normal chess—it's as she says."
"..."
"Don't forget. The two of us are one, the two of us are . Okay?"
"...So...rry. I'll be... careful..."
"Allright! Then let's do this!"
He said, then patted Shiro's head—and then whispered beside her ear.
"—UntilI see through their cheating and come up with a plan, go win this."
Nodding in confirmation, Shiro slowly approached the table.
"Are you done talking?—Then let's start, you can have the first move."
"...—"
Towards this obvious challenge, Shiro frowned for a moment.
Chess was 'no different from tic-tac-toe', was what Shiro had said.
What she said was no less than giving up the win.
Because chess is a game where if both players played optimally, then
theoretically [the first player wins].
For someone moving second, it would require the opponent to make at least
one mistake to even start thinking about a [tie].
[ ]
the strongest
"...b2 pawn, b4."
With a slightly spoiled mood, Shiro said, and the match started.
Not by moving with their hands, but by issuing voice commands, the
chessboard where the pieces automatically move.
Following the rules, limited to the first move, the pawn moved forward 2
squares.
—But, Kurami had said.
'The pieces have their own wills'.
There was no way that was referring to just moving automatically—.
While Sora was immersed in thought, Kurami quietly muttered.
"Pawn number 7, 'forward'."
Instantly—the commanded pawn.
——Moved forward 3 squares.
"""—Huh!?"""
The people who raised their voice were Sora as well as the audience.
"These are 'pieces with their own wills'—didn't I say so?"
A light smile appearing on her face, Kuramispoke.
"The pieces reflect the player's 'charisma', 'commanding ability', 'guiding
ability', 'right to be king', and move according to that—don't you think it's a
suitable game for deciding the king?"
"—tch."
Sora clicked his tongue—but there was no need to panic.
"...d2 pawn, d3."
Simply and calmly, Shiro continued to play, .
"Ara, is that okay, to be playing so leisurely?"
...However, provocations have no use against Shiro once she starts playing.
Also, there was the brother in reserve. Shiro's overwhelming concentration.
Can even destroy gods.
...And then. In reality.
Unfazed by Kurami's pieces continuously moving against the rules. Not even
falling into danger once, Shiro continued moving her pieces—
"...I see."
Fearing a certain thing, Sora.
If it was as Kuramisaid, and in this game the 'pieces with their own wills'
were the key, then— that fear was very soon brought to reality.
"Pawn 5, forward."
The commanded piece—.
Did not move.
"...Eh?"
For the first time since coming here, Shiro showed a confused expression.
Similarly, Steph and the audience had the same confusion.
"—As I thought, it's like that huh."
Clicking his tongue because his prediction came true, Sora. In other words.
The key to this chess game being that with charisma then the pieces will move
ignoring the rules—was wrong. 'That the pieces won't move without enough
charisma' was the real key. If the pieces were real[soldiers] then first of all a
strategy that could not be used normally— that was,
"We can't [sacrifice pieces], huh."
—For the sake of the war, happily giving up their lives, such soldiers normally
didn't exist. The thorough commands, orders—combined with the madness
that was the initial burst of morale had made this strategy possible in the
beginning. But now that 'sacrificing pieces' had been sealed—
"—"
Shiro bit her nails, and for the first time entered a long thought.
...That's right—the tactics available were mostly limited. However the soldiers
of the lightly smiling Kurami were, without any disorder, continuing to
move...It was the first time they were pushing back against Shiro, who had an
advantage, but it didn't take long.
—The situation quickly worsened. With their morale diminished the pieces
started ignoring commands more often, and Shiro was growing increasingly
frustrated. The frustration of the commander transmitted to the soldiers,
making the situation even worse—...If this continues, then there was no hope.
"..."
She probably realized it herself—that there was no longer any way for Shiro
to win.
However—it was enough.
Shiro held the match, which allowed Sora to observe.
With the eyes like a zombie, filled with self-scorn, no matter how you look at
it there was no sign of anything like charisma. The movement of Kurami's
pieces told him 120% of the realform of the cheating.
—Placing his hand on his sister's shoulder, Sora said.

"Shiro, let's switch."
"..."
His sister's downcast eyes were hidden by the long white hair. But, he could
tell that she probably hid a thin layer of tears.
—That was to be expected. 『 』 does not permit any losses. Especially in
chess—which his sister had not once lost in.
"......Nii... So...rry."
"—What's wrong."
".........I... lost...... so... rr... y."
Saying this, Shiro buried her face in her brother's chest. But, hugging that
head, Sora said.
"Huh? What are you saying, we haven't lost yet."
"......"
"—The two of us together are 『 』 —untilI lose too, it doesn't count as a
loss."
Shiro looked up at Sora, who said this. The expression that he showed was
his usual arrogance—that it was impossible to lose, confidence.
"Also, this isn't chess—in this game, you have not beaten me even once."
"...eh...?"
"Well, just watch—this game is in my field of responsibility."
Sniff, sniff, then.
Rubbing the tears from his sister's eyes, covered by her bangs, Sora. He
couldn't tell her expression from her lowered head, but he could tellshe was
still down. The sister started getting up from the chair as urged—but Sora
stopped her.
"A crybaby, huh. A child that leaves in the middle of a match, and a naive
brother that thinks he can make a comeback at this point... it does seem like
the two of you have the qualifications to be King. That is, the qualifications to
be a joke of a king."
Ignoring those words by Kurami. Lifting the body of his sister off the ground,
Sora.
"...?"
Shiro's body stiffened due to suddenly being carried.
—Raising the overly light, even ifshe was only eleven, sister.
Reached the table and sat her on his knees, Sora.
"...?"
"Didn't I say, the two of us are 『 』. We are here. And, if I lose my calm
then please give me a hand."
To the speechless sister, Sora said.
With a smile, but with a bottomless eeriness, Sora spoke towards Kurami.
"Whew, what a pinch."—then.
"—Was that... said towards me?"
"In this cheating game that you got from the elves by selling this hole or that
hole, I'm gonna beat you, so you better start thinking about apologies—the
price for making my sister cry is high, you prostitute."
Kurami's face twitched, but he ignored that.
Facing towards the board, Sora. Taking a big breath of air—and then.
"TO ALL SOLDIERS!"
Including the sister sitting on his lap. Everyone in the hall covered their ears, in
a voice that shook the walls, he yelled.
"THOSE WHO EARN AN ACHIEVEMENT IN THIS BATTLE—
BY THE AUTHORITYOF THE KING, I GIVE YOU THE RIGHT
TO HAVE INTERCOURSE WITH THE GIRL YOU LIKE ONCE!"
——.
Suddenly, a silence like the bottom of the sea wrapped around the castle.
What the silence signified was—confusion, contempt, amazement. But, not
caring about this, Sora continued.
"Furthermore! All of you soldiers who fight on the front line, after this
battle is won you will be freed from further military service, and from
the responsibilities to pay tax for life! The country will guarantee you
veteran benefits! Therefore—don't you die a virgin! Also, those with
family or loved ones waiting—you must all return alive!"
Due to the exceedingly vulgar speech, once again the castle replied with
silence.
—However. From the chess board.
"UwooooOOOOHHHHHHHHHHHHHhHHHH!!"
—A war cry resounded.
A strict contrast to what was going on inside the castle. But the speech had
not ended.
"To my army, to my men! Lend your ears to my words! This battle is ours—
Alkia's, mankind's! It's a battle to decide who rules this city, our last fort, and
thus one that decides the fate of mankind! Listen well! Open your eyes and
look, at the king of that country—"
Then, suddenly, at his opponent—Kurami, he pointed and yelled.
"Leaving it to this zombie-like idiot, this bitch lacking in intelligence, are
you really okay with that!"
"Wha—"
Then, ignoring the stunned Kurami, he grabbed his dejected sister's drooping
head.
Sweeping away her bangs, exposing her face. Peeking out from behind the
pure white, albino long hair was a skin white like snow. Also revealed were
her beautifulruby-like eyes, filled with a redness that seemed to suck one in
—but they were dyed with sadness.
"If we achieve victory, then she will be the queen! That's right, think about
what happened back then! To guide us to victory she closed her heart and
commanded you, but each of you dismissed her as [ruthless] and caused her
to cry! I'll only ask once—"
"CAN YOU STILL CALL YOURSELVES MENNNNNNN!"
Then, immediately, he gave an order to a pawn.
"To the seventh pawn squadron! The enemy is invading our front lines! If we
just wait in this stalemate, then we'll be hit from the sides—[rush and flank
them!]—secure the initiative!"
Then, as if responding to that shout. The pawn moved forward 2 squares,
then continued and flanked the enemy pawn—destroying it.
"Wh—impossible!?"
Towards the bewildered Kurami, Sora spoke with a huge grin.
"Hmm? It's something that you've done too, is there something to be surprised
about?"
"—Grrr..."
But, the sister on Sora's lap muttered.
"...If this was a real battle... then with this the soldier should be tired... and
can't move for a while."
"Yeah, it's as you say, but—second cavalry team! Don't let go of the
opportunity that the seventh pawn squadron opened! No matter what protect
the 'heroes' that cut open the path!"
Then, without waiting for the opponent's turn, he continued.
"And then the king and queen over there! In other words you are the two of
us but hurry and move towards the front lines."
—At these commands that were impossible according to chess's rules, the
audience, and even Shiro, opened their eyes wide.
Well—in the first place.
"H, hey! What are you doing ignoring my turns—!"
—Kurami complained, but with a look like pitying a wild dog, Sora said.
"Huh? Are you an idiot? Is there anyone who waits for their opponent's turn
in a real war?"
In the first place, the pieces were moving. In other words, they were
processing the commands.
"If you're worried about your turn, then why don't you give commands before
I do, stupid♥"
If you have a problem then say it to the chessboard, is what he left it with. In
one breath, throwing out absurd arguments one after another like they made
sense, Sora. But—the reality is that the pieces moved. Which means that
there was nothing wrong with this. In that case—
"Guuuu—pawns, advance in order! Build a defense wall!!"
Urgently throwing out counter-commands, Kurami.
Immediately, Sora found a flaw.
"Hah! Look, their troops are hiding themselves behind walls, look at their
cowardly form!"
With an exaggerated wave of his hand, in perfect acting, he yelled.
"Leaving the soldiers to fight in the front lines and waiting in the back, what
kind of king, what kind of queen are you! The king and the queen—the rulers,
are the ones who should guide the citizens —To everyone we continue, the
proud knights, bishops, and rooks! Now is the time to work according to
your titles! Protect the and 'prove yourself'!"
—Slandering the opponent's tactics, though underhanded, it raised morale.
Encouraged by the speech which would've been called [propaganda tactics]
in the real world, the pieces hurriedly moved. Then, once again towards
Kurami—and also towards the pieces that she led, he said.
"Hmpf—using the elves' magic to forcefully raise the morale of your own
troops—it could be said in a real battle that—this would be called
[brainwashing magic], huh?"
infantry
pawns
"—"
Kurami's expression distorted slightly.
If you think that wouldn't have been enough for him to realize he hit the bull'seye,
then you'd be way underestimating the boy named Sora.
"I see, it would be hard to prove, and would bring a crushing advantage in this
game. Even if the opponent is an expert in chess, unable to predict the
movement of the pieces, unable to even sacrifice pieces, they would fall into
disorder..."
He placed his hand on his sister's head.
"But, you made a big [miscalculation]."
Then, once again he resumed his speech in a loud voice.
"Since antiquity, there had never been cases where kings who commanded
their army tyrannically were referred to as great kings, because more than
anything people fight only for justice—and,there is only one absolute justice
in this world!"
Usually, the spiritless younger sister with eyes half closed. The continuation of
the situation where she suddenly opened her eyes. In that face—her eyes
snapped open, showing the face of a beautiful girl who would enchant anyone
who looked at her.
"You are in the presence of the queen! If you bastards are men then don't let
those eyes be filled with tears again!"
—As if in reply.
Once again from the board, a war cry that shook the table resounded.
"—That's right... [Cuteness], that is the only unchanging justice in this world."
Hugging the sister sitting on his lap, Sora boldly declared.
The only response came from the board, creating an amazing temperature
difference compared to the room—but he paid no attention to that. There
was no way that the residents of this world who knew no battles would
understand.
—The reason men risk their lives and fight, no matter which world it was this
didn't change.
That is, for their loved ones. For the honor in order to charm their loved ones.
To say it bluntly.
—It was for the sake of [eroticism]... there was no other way to say it...
"—Pawn number 5! Destroy the opponent's knight!"
The pawn that Kurami ordered attacked his army's knight—but.
Embracing his sister in one hand, he stood up from the chair, and while
swinging his arm Sora yelled!
"Oh honourable knight, trained by us and bestowed by the queen with the title
of knight, are you at the level of being defeated by a measly pawn! With the
name of the queen, as well as your title on the line, I will not allow you to die
without permission! The enemy is just a single soldier, it can't do anything but
take your back. Turn around and retreat, maintain the line—break open a
path to survival with your sword and shield!"
As the pawn that should've been attacking captured the knight—
Right before that, instead, it broke apart.
""—Huuuuuuuuuuuuuuuh!?""
From Steph to Kurami, everyone in the castle let out a similar sound.
However, that sound did not reach him.
Really placing himself in the battle, Sora once again yelled.
"You have fought well, you have endured well, oh valiant knight! That is what
it truly means to be the sword of the people! —But, for now you should rest
that sword for a while and recover! The reward for your actions on the
battlefield today, I swear on my name to provide it to you!"
As he did so, the knight—a mere chess piece. Turned towards Sora—no...
towards the [king]. An action as if giving a bow—poof, disappearing from the
top of the board, moving to the side of the table.
—A situation which is impossible in chess, [simultaneous kill]. At a loss of
words, Kurami, and as if mocking her, Sora responded.
"Ha ha ha, you idiot. A chess that emulates a real battle? Against an opponent
like me who has never lost in Civilization or Daisenryaku, did you think you
could win in a simplified version like this game?"
That's right—this was not chess. This was a [strategy game]. A magic that
maintains the morale—that is indeed a rather advantageous magic. But
something like that was worth no more than something that maintains the
statuses of the socialsystems or the wonders of the world. Also—the
weaknesses of those systems, he was also familiar with.
In essence, that was the playing style that results from relying on those effects
— If the opponent's playing style could be grasped—
It could not longer be called a match.
"Third pawn squadron! Seize the chance—take down the enemy bishop!"
Confidently, aiming straight for checkmate, Sora yelled out a command, and
the piece faithfully moved to follow it. But, just before reaching the bishop—
—The pawn was dyed black.
"""—Wha!?"""
The audience let out a shocked voice. But that had already become
something of a norm. But, for the first time—Sora had been part of that
group. Kurami could clearly tellfrom Sora's expression that the phenomenon
had been out of his expectations. Hehe... with a thin, dark smile, Kurami
spoke.
"Brainwashing—it can cause some pretty interesting results. With
brainwashing then it's definitely possible, something like this."
Forcibly turning the attacking piece black.
'Forced brainwashing' —
In other words, all of the attacks from this side were completely sealed.
...Shit.
——Shit. Shit shit shit shit shit shit shit shit!
Without showing it on his face, Sora realized that he had made a fatal
mistake. He arbitrarily believed that the cheat the opponent had been using
was to 'maintain a crazed morale amongst the troops'.
—The mistake he had so arrogantly pointed out to Steph a few days ago had
come and bitten himself.
I failed—failed failed failed failed! What a grave blunder—! That is, when the
threat of losing approaches imminently, without caring whether the use of
magic becomes exposed—the possibility of risking a cheat that might have
been detected as abnormal in the face of loss—!
Why didn't I consider this—I'm such an idiot!
"—All units, retreat! The enemy is using brainwashing magic, do not approach
them!"
With Sora's overwhelming leadership, even the pieces that should not be able
to retreat started to retreat. However,
"Fufu, trying to be a war king? A king trying to be a rear guard, stop messing
around."
Seeing the tides change, Kurami barked an order against the [king]—in other
words, at [Sora].
The enemy queen approached.
"Behead the enemy king, my queen! Checkmate!"
"Brother..."
The hall grew noisy, even Shiro felt the danger, and raised her voice. But—
towards the approaching piece, Sora said.
"—Oh queen, please lower thy sword... for thou art—beautiful."
......
"""—Huh?"""
With the audience, Kurami, and even Shiro stunned, Sora passionately and
fervently started to coax the piece—the queen.
"Ahh, dear queen. Dost thou serveth that king of thy own will, or hast thee
other reasons—but prithee, listen to thy heart. Is that king one worthy of thy
service?"
Like a first-rate theatrician. With a sweet voice like the playboy of the
century, Sora unleased his beautifully woven words. It was as if he was a
handsome young king on the battlefield.
"Brainwashing the soldiers, the citizens, and using them as swords, as tools—
moreover, for he who made you stand up to everything yet remains frightened
within, is such a king worth swinging thy sword and flaunting thy beauty for?!
Oh dear beautiful queen, it is but cursed fate that brought us to meet as this,
as enemies. Prithee, lower your blade, and take a good look—your people,
those who should be protected—your king! Where are they now!"
—Clang—.
A sound as if a sword dropping to the ground echoed.
—This time, the black queen became dyed in white. Not a single sound
could be heard any longer from the dumbfounded gallery. The only sounds
came from Kurami who was at a lost for words, and the slightly snickering
Sora.
"——Wha——"
"Kukuku, galge
[21] are one of the few games where I'm better than my sister."
"—Y-you..."
Hearing Kurami grinding her teeth, the audience sighed, as if relieved. As long
as Sora could do the same thing as the enemy, the situation is back to a draw
—is what they probably thought.
—But that was not true. It was completely wrong. This was—no more than
something that could only be done because it had been Sora and the enemy
queen. But Kurami—though it could not be confirmed, but it seemed like she
could brainwash any piece. While sealing off his attacks completely—the
enemy could attack without holding back. The only thing that awaits ahead—
are the two words 'certain defeat'.
—What do I do. What do I do Sora, you 18 year old virgin—!
Sora tried with all his power to keep the composed smile on his face from
collapsing. His mind fiercely searched for a way to somehow overcome this
situation. Well—to be accurate, he had found a way.
There is—a way. It's a possibility... but will the opponent fall for it!?
—It was an all or nothing gamble. If it succeeded then for the moment he
could hang on. But if it failed—then his chance of victory would be
completely crushed. Compared with the risk of the gamble, the merits are
only temporary—would it be a good choice? While the excessive secretion of
hormones in his brain even compressed time, Sora continued to think.
But this time, Shiro. She gently—enveloped her brother's face with those two
small hands.
"——Wh...?"
Suddenly feeling the warmth on his cheeks, his body trembled slightly.
However, Shiro looked Sora in the eyes, and in a small voice continued.
"...Nii, you said... calm down, when you're back, help."
"——"
"...The two of us are... 『 』..."
Ahh...
"—Yeah, you're right..."
"......Are you, okay?"
—Do you think it will work?
The brother's eyes silently asked, and the sister, slightly, but strongly,
...Nodded.
—Right, Shiro—this genius girl—his proud sister. Against an opponent who
moved without regards to the rules, using only pure chess moves she had
once held the upper hand. That could not be possible unless she could read
what the opponent—Kurami, will do. In psychological tactics, the brother
was largely superior to the sister—however.
Once again, Sora thought to himself.
—Don't forget. His sister—had even defeated God. That sister, from purely
evaluating the situation, had asserted that it will work. Then, what he must do
is believe in his sister, and with that as the premise, construct a strategy! Then
—Kurami, with her shoulders shaking.
"—Knight! Cut down the double-crossing queen!"
——She fellfor it... The thoroughly rigged—trap. The commanded black
knight shook as if in inner conflict, and then—
It turned white.
"W-why... w-what did you do!?"
—This was it. This was the one and only way to survive. Something that
Kurami would not be able to stand ifshe was really fighting for humankind,
and her [reaction] towards that betrayal. Also that she was even now thinking
that we were also using some kind of cheat... That was—the outline of the
only remaining way to achieve victory. Ahh, to be expected of my sister.
Conveying this by patting the sister's head, the sister closed her eyes in
comfort as ifshe were a cat. Then, as if it was all as planned, Sora spoke with
an indomitable smile.
"Oh King, oh foolish king. To have thy vassal to slay thy queen... what a cruel
command. Thou would doest well to calm down. Those shoulders shaking
with anger—they are not what the citizens should see."
"You—traitor...!"
Believing Sora to have sold out the humans and was using the assistance of
other countries to cheat, Kurami. On that face was not the zombie-like sense
of helplessness or sense of responsibility that had been there until now, it was
pure anger. In comparison, Sora's face was arrogant, fearless, and filled with
confidence.
...But who would have sensed it at that time.
That even right at this moment, Sora was the one who, heart pulsing with a
force as if it would break, was mobilizing all his thought power. Sora's brain
was still limited to the knowledge he gained through various quiz games and
history games. Recreating battles to the limit of what he knew, and running
simulations.
—That's right, the situation hadn't turned for the better in the slightest.
This tactic was not something that could be repeatedly used. It was merely a
one time bluff to plant the seed of doubt in the opponent. It was a dangerous
tightrope where just another attack could cause everything to fail. In that case
—the only way is to win without fighting——
Win without fighting?
——
—And then.
In this situation that was equal to [certain defeat].
Sora finally saw a speck of light.
"—Shiro. I'll leave the command of the troops to you. Can you maneuver
them so they will not be brainwashed?"
"...No, problem."
Without asking for the reason, the sister saluted and took control of the
troops.
—This was, once more, an all or nothing gamble. However, this time it was a
gamble for a guaranteed win. There were only two ways to come out
victorious in this situation. As far as Sora's knowledge goes, the way to win
without fighting—which is.
"Oh dear queen—"
Leaving the sister in control, Sora started to talk to the now allied, ex-enemy
queen.
"I cannot bring myself to order thee—nor thy faithful, proud knights who
lowered their swords, to turn thy weapons towards thy own citizens—thy
brethren. This battle, this situation... that it is no longer but a meritless brawl
should be clear to anyone—thy king—is now but a crucible of madness."
Then, Sora, within the span of the seconds hand making a fullrevolution.
Several thousand lines of words spun through his brain, and came out as the
of the century.
"Thy citizens are thy citizens—the one to guide them in place of the [mad
king] can be no other than thee—are there any objections!"
Sora's speech. Its aim. Not one person in the castle, not even Kurami could
uncover it. Thus the castle replied with silence—just like the many times that
had happened up to now. Waiting for the something that would exceed all
expectations—they waited in silence. Then—finally, a result that was
probably the answer to those anticipations.
The originally black queen—but what is now a white queen.
—This time became dyed in red.
In addition, the black pieces in the front line mostly turned red.
gamble
persuasion
"———Huuuuuh!?"
Kurami was the one and only person who screamed out. Probably, none of
the other audience members had been able to comprehend what just
happened. However, with the continuation of Sora's act—they were finally
able to grasp the situation.
"I commendeth thee for taking a stand, oh respectable and brave queen!
Righteous ones who overcame thy brainwashing to follow thy queen! I shant
telleth thee to cut down thy brethren! Furthermore, I doth not believe that thy
brethren wishes to cut thee! The ones who shall mark the end of the
tyrannous reign of the mad king who steals the freedom of his subjects
repeatedly through brainwashing, is none other than thee!"
That's right, this is.
Inciting a [revolution]—the advent of a third power.
"I doth not wish for bloodshed! Like what any would wish for—I wish for
peace! I wish for both sides to lay down their swords. I will not allow any
more blood to flow!"
Following the pronouncement, one by one, the number of red pieces by the
red queen's side increased.
—Though they might have no hesitation in cutting down their enemies.
But.
"—Y-you, it doesn't matter! Dispose of all traitors!"
Consumed by rage and still not understanding the situation, Kurami once
again—fell into a trap.
"You have made yet another mistake, oh foolish king. Since old, dealing with
revolutions through 'Military Oppression' is the worst possible strategy."
—Though they have no hesitation in cutting down their enemies. Even under
the effects of brainwashing magic—it is not easy to cut down a comrade-inarms.
As Sora spoke, the pieces that Kurami commanded turned red one by
one.
"—Wh... this... what happened, what kind of tricks did you pull!"
She who tried to protect mankind, going as far as to borrow the elves' power,
Kurami. That feeling, strengthened by the feelings from being betrayed, stole
her composure.
"... All units, support, the red queen... expand the perimeter... don't, let
anyone, die."
Following Sora's intentions, through precise orders, Shiro was able to even
mobilize the red pieces strategically. It wasn't anything spectacular. It was just
to use the pieces that Kurami's army would have a hard time attacking, the
red queen's forces, as a shield. To put it another way, she manipulated the
pieces in the red queen's forces to create a situation where attacks from both
sides would be ineffective.
—The result.
"To allsoldiers, take the enemy king's head at all costs... you should all just
move according to my commands—cut down and dispose of all traitors."
Sora couldn't—Imanity couldn't feel anything. But, probably an even stronger
brainwashing magic had been cast. Eerily, silently, the black army started its
advance. Red pieces or white pieces. The aura exuding from the marching
pieces clearly showed that the black army would annihilate everything, as
those in the castle held their breath.
"...Brother, to block off... the path of retreat of a weakened enemy, ends like
this."
As a slight amount of cold sweat started to form, even the sister pointed and
said. However, Sora replied with a smile.
"I know—that's why I did it."
Crack—
Such a sound, without any reason, suddenly resounded.
The black king, in other words Kurami's king.
—Cracks started running across.
"—Eh—wh, what?"
The cracks spread across the black king. Towards the confused Kurami
staring stupefied, Sora answered disinterestedly.
"A tyrant that continues oppressing, ruling through fear, and brainwashing—is
a strange thing."
This was—[the second way] that Sora knew—of how to 'win without
fighting'.
"It's fine while he continues winning, but if ever he lost, no matter which world
it is, for some reason the end of that ruler, as ifset in stone, is known."
...That is.
"Their end will be due to an assassination by someone close to them who is
not even a soldier."
—This was something that had been repeated many times in history, a
historicalfact of Sora's world. In essence, let the brainwashing expand, make
them not care about appearance. After establishing the 'tyrant', force them
closer to defeat. As they begin to move as a 'mad king'—'self destruction'.
Then, the cracking black king crumbled. Everyone in the castle, Kurami
included, stared wordlessly.
"Sorry, but our world is not as nice a place as this world."
Winning, standing up from the chair, Sora and Shiro.
"—About wars or killing bouts, we're experts compared with you guys."
Then, a large sigh. Exchanging a light high-five with Shiro, Sora stared
towards the horizon. Towards their original world. As if looking far off into
the distance, he squinted his eyes.
"This stays only within a game. Ahh, it's a good world, this place..."
...So, he muttered.
Part 4
"How, how amazing....."
—An abnormal, overwhelming and wonderful victory.
The only person whispering in the midst of all that cheering in the castle, was
Steph.
Perhaps the audience that sent out all those cheers did not know the truth.
But Steph had understood it completely.
However, this does not mean that she could comprehend the tactics and
significant lines said by those two.
Because she herself did not know what their world was like.
But.
That person— Kurami, was backed by extremely powerful elves.
Just before the start of the duel, magic was incorporated into the game to
allow cheating.
And both of them directly challenged and defeated the opponent. Only she
understood this fact.
Which means— albeit indirectly,
Fighting against the world's largest kingdom, Avant Heim, would definitely be
beaten down.
It means races that are driven by magic gained an insight, mere humans could
also achieve victory from their hands.
Historically, this had not even happened before.
So—
"........Are they really, humans?"
Fear— with fear slowly growing inside her heart, Steph whispered out.
In total contrast with the heated atmosphere of the city, the defeated Kurami
lowered her head while remaining silent.
Without even giving her a glance, the siblings gallantly left the table.
For this pair ofsiblings that was walking towards herself—
Steph momentarily forgot what she had to do.
—Because this can't be helped right?
Rightfully defeating the absolute enemy that manipulated magic, yet they didn't
even feel the joy of winning at all.
—"Defeat that doesn't exist for 『 』".........
Generally proving this statement, she stood in front of the two victors with a
completely natural look, wondering what she should say in the end.
However— completely unaware of the entanglement in Steph's heart, Sora
said with a frivolous tone.
"—Is this fine now?"
"..........Eh?"
"Your grandpa—the Late King being treated as a fool, this criticism would
not be left behind for the future generations, right?"
"—Ah....."
"If letting no other, but Imanity's strongest 『 』to become the king— he will
be known as a virtuous king."
".......This way, Elchea.........will not perish, great, is it not..........Steph?"
Although she felt troubled and confused by their words.
She once again recalled the reason for their actions.
But being able to get a satisfying result despite of all that had happened.
With tears trickling down from her eyes, Steph said it bluntly.

"Thank you.......really—I am really grateful....."
Mixing with the little whimpers she was making, the sound produced was
difficult to identify.
However, Shiro tiptoed, and gently caressed Steph's head.
At this point, the tears which could no longer be suppressed gushed out from
Stephanie Dora's eyes.
—At this time.
".......Ne"
A whisper which was inadvertently leaked out from Kurami's mouth, got
covered up by the loud cheering from the crowd.
But, these words were clearly heard by Sora, Shiro and Steph.
"Please tell me.........what kind of tricks did you guys use."
Coldly muttering, Kuramistared at Sora with sharp eyes, before continuing.
"Ah, you were indeed right. I did borrow the strength of the elves, the only
measure to ensure that humans survive. But this is completely destroyed by
you. Answer me, where did you spies come from? Don't you think about
saying that you are just mere humans that could defeat elven magic!"
In her eyes, Sora was tantamount to a despicable enemy who had abandoned
his own kind, before questioning him.
While watching Kurami with eyes full of hatred, Steph gasped— but for the
siblings,
"We were planing on saying that, and it's the truth."
".........What, problem?"
Because Sora was strolling towards Kurami, the heated cheers in the City
instantly died down.
"To be truthful, if you can prove what you say, that you were merely
borrowing the power of the elf for the sake of human kind, then I really think
that that's not a bad strategy, and it is not impossible to make me abandon
this game."
"Since it's like that—!"
"But, I can't stand your ideals."
Without the usage of any acting, Sora used contempting eyes to look down
on Kurami.
"Disregarding the words of [Using elven magic as a pedal], but if it was
interpreted as [Can't live normally without the shelter of elf-sama], it would be
so degrading that it would make people scoff."
"—Doesn't matter, history, and situation proved that this is the limit of what
the human species can do!"
Using a tone that implies that a trick was obviously used, yet having the
audacity to teach me a lesson was Kurami.
"That was just some limit that a guy left could achieve, but that is not our
limit...."
Sourly finishing the sentence, Sora revealed a smile.
"For humans, humans have their own way of doing things. And also— much
gratitude to you who was convinced that we were also cheating, which
allowed us to achieve victory."
Hearing that line, Kuramisucked in air, and recalled the battle that happened
just now.
Although her own attention was completely focused on how to expose their
cheat, but what if.......
What if, from the start, they didn't even use any cheat at all?
"That kind of thing..........is impossible.........mere humans— are unable to
confront magic..........:"
"You are free to think of that, which is your own limit."
Narrowing both of his eyes.
"No matter if the opponent is Elf—or God, defeat doesn't exist in 『 』's
dictionary."
Saying that— as if trampling on her own self-esteem.
He grabbed hold of Kurami's chin, and ripped away the black veil covering
her face.
Looking at those eyes that stared straight, for the first time where anger was
present, Sora— said.
"Stop— underestimating humans!"
....Only these words.

The entire city fellsilent.
Similar to being engraved in the heart, it kept echoing.
Similar to cutting off the strand of the『Most inferior species』.
Similar to a ray of light piercing through the perpetual darkness.
—Similar to the quiet hope of fire in everyone's heart that were ignited.
—Then, a sound leaked out from Kurami's mouth.
"Guu—"
".........Gu?"
"Guwahhahahhahahahahahahahhahhahahahahahahaahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
—"
"Whoa! What's happening!?"
Suddenly, Kuramisat on the floor and burst into tears.
Facing against the problem where you are too scared to deal with it and
backing off was Sora— and sadly, censure could be not be added anymore.
"Whaaaaaaaaaaaaa idiot—stupid—! Just to get..............elf's strength gugu,
obv-obviously without formalities, how much trouble to conclude a
contract.......you guys, you guys ahhhhhhhhhh, I didn't underestimate~~~~I
was being serious——Wuhaaaaa.............."
With bean-like tears rolling down and crying out loudly, Kurami's action
dumbfounded everyone in the hall.
In the end, was this the reaction caused by someone who shouldered a heavy
load for liberation, or was this the character she had all along—
But, it was common for difficult children to cry in that world.
".........Nii.......made a girl........cry......"
"Eh, wait, this is my fault!?"
"Wuhaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa.....idiot.......stupid.....go die........."
In the scene where the audience were celebrating happily for the victory.
But now, they only watched from afar the soft cursings and whimpering of
Kurami—
Chapter 4 - Grandmaster/The King
Part 1
While crying, Kurami kept scolding out idiot and stupid.
'I will never admit it! I will absolutely expose you all—!'
Even up till the end when Kurami left, she kept kicking up a fuss.
"Aiyah aiyah.........what is the meaning of a human evaluating another human
eh........."
After Sora said these troubled words, the city was once again filled with
applause.
—Very fastidious about this victory.
Without any doubts, this victory had clearly showed that mankind still had a
sliver of chance.
With the hall completely bundled with the deafening cheers, an old official
walked towards Sora, holding onto a crown.
"Then, Sora-sama is it?"
"Yup."
"So you will be the one to ascend to the throne as the new king of Elchea,
right?"
"Can't do."
Hugging his little sister, he said while laughing.
"The two of us are 『 』— so the king belongs to us."
These were also the words he said during the chess duel.
With those words, the audience started an even higher-pitched applause—
for congratulating the new king and queen.
—However.
"—It's a pity, but that can't be done."
"—Eh?"
Hearing those words from the official, the cheers of the crowd halted.
"Ah? Eh, why?"
"The Ten Oaths stated that they can only elect a 『Sole representative』. So
two people cannot assume the post."
In the midst of the chattering hall, Sora and Shiro exchange glances.
Entering into a deep thought with a perturbed expression, Sora scratched his
head and furrowed his brow............before saying.
"............Ah, that, so be it, I'll be the one to be the representative, will that
work?"
".............Guu."
Gently releasing his little sister who was muttering, Sora faced the official.
"Then once again I'll announce—*cough cough*, from now, Sora-sama will
be the 255th generation king of Elchea— any objections please stand up,
otherwise remain silent—"
—But, unable to maintain that silence, someone raised up a hand and
interrupted the sentence.
"........Un."
A white-haired Shiro.
With her pair of ruby red eyes barely visible underneath her bangs, it was the
girl— who exactly said that,
"Eh? Shiro?"
".......I have, an objection."
"Gu, that, little sister, what are you doing?"
"........If, Nii, becomes king........Nii will build, harem."
"———————————Ah?"
Unable to believe what he had just heard, Sora could not help but ask, but
Shiro with an expression as ifshe was going to cry out said out.
".........That way........Shiro.........wouldn't be..........needed anymore."
Completely ignoring the stares from the stunned audience, Sora went into a
state of embarrassment he had never experienced before.
"Wait! Just, wait a moment, how is that possible! Aren't the both of us a
team! In the final conclusion, I'm just a king by name, I don't want Shiro to do
this kind of—"
"........But, the King is......Nii.........Shiro is just...............an accesory. If, if
there can only be one person..............the one to do it—"
Wiping away the tears, light was no longer reflected from her eyes.
".....to be the King— is Shiro."
The little sister who always felt weak, had clearly emitted an aura as if
declaring for war.
Facing Shiro who was intently staring at Sora, while announcing out her
intentions—
"—Ah?"
Getting stared at, Sora changed his expression.
"Hey hey hey........My sister. It really is new for you to crack a joke, has the
sun finally risen up from the west?"
Although his frivolous actions and expression were the same as always.
There was definite hostility felt from his tone of voice.
"Let's see, a beautiful girl like you wanting to be the king of a collapsing
country. You are just too straightforward. You'll definitely get drawn in by
someone's sweet words— so if you want to be the King, your brother
absolutely forbades you from doing so!"
Although Sora opposed his little sister with words that can't be more hurtful
than that.
He worded it so that if interpreted correctly, it would be seen as though he
was spoiling his little sister, but his eyes were clearly not smiling.
".........No, won't, let Nii, become King— absolutely."
"—That's good. Nii also can't let you become the King, absolutely."
It was like a debate competition, where no one backs down.
Both of their interests intertwined and collided.
Even cracking the cheat by the Elves, and achieving the title of Imanity's
strongest Duo.
Their eyes belonged to neither a pair of loving siblings, nor the Duo player
called 『 』.
But opponents of a long history, constantly depending on each other's vigor,
with occasionalsparks flying out upon collision with their eyesight.
"Th-that.....If that's the case, I will please invite both of you to have one final
battle, will this settle it all?"
Intervening between the two people probably took great courage.
Requiring confirmation, the official had to ask with an apologetic tone.
"Ah, that's fine."
"........No, problem."
An instantaneous answer coming out from both sides.
In a situation where their eyesight remains in contact, they issued out their
declaration of war.
"Little sister, I won't be lenient today oh. Today I will definitely make you
regret that."
".........Nii, should.......prepare yourself.........today, Shiro will, use her full
strength."
——………………
—Just like that.
Three days went past in a blink of an eye.
Continuously around the clock and after countless games, the central hall was
littered with various items.
The siblings were sprawled out on the floor.
"..........Ugh.....little bit more......you can admit defeat already."
"........Nii, is the one......hurry up and, give up."
The conditions for victory was two wins in a row, with that, the countless
number of games commenced.
And the outcome— It was currently at the 501th battle, with 158 wins, 158
losses and 184 draws.
—What was unfortunate, was that not just this place, even when the siblings
were in their 『Original World』.
『 』 which was regarded as an urban legend— nobody knew their
competition records.
But different from 『 』, which is attained when both their names are
combined.
It was the battles between these two people who loved games more than
anything else in the world.
And their record would be—
3526744 battles, 1170080 wins, 1170080 losses, 1186584 draws—
........So far, it had always been a stalemate between those two, no winner, no
loser.
Of course, everyone who weren't aware of this truth and were waiting for the
coronation ceremony to happen, had already gone home.
—Then gathered again, then went home again, a constant repetition, and with
the passing date, the number of audience that came gradually reduced.
Those that worked tirelessly in the City fell asleep freely in the hall—and
barely maintaining their consciousness was Steph and the official who started
to see hallucinations after being awake for a long time.
The old official began to revealstrange smiles from time to time, before
switching back to his normal expression.
While Steph kept mouthing out "Ah, butterfly~", with an empty smile and
feebly trying to reach out for the emptiness.
—Then, what should the next game be.............Sora thought while in a state
of haziness for this problem.
However, a certain uncertainty flashed through his mind and he stopped his
action.
"—Fuu.............why must only one person hold the position of King?"
".....Eh?"
From this sentence, the Official and Steph snapped back into reality and
responded.
Blurting out those words, Sora retrieved his phone from his pocket.
Double confirming the 【Ten Oaths】 that he had recorded down, Sora
continued.
"【7】of the 『Ten Oaths』, All matters for group conflicts will be decided by a
representative....."
What it means here is, the group—which is also the country or inter-ethnic
conflict should be carried out by the decided representative.
—Even so.
As if trying to repeatedly mull over, Sora carefully pondered about this.
Slowly rereading out the sentence once more. He tried to confirm if what he
thinks contradicts with the sentence.
Following that, he softly whispered.
"—It clearly did not state that it was only 『One person』 right?"
""""!!!!!""""
—Just like that.
The [Nightmarish three days] willforever be passed down, and the bards
who had been singing during the duration of the fight had finally come to a
stop.
However, because the song was too long.
It wasn't kept and had to be discarded....
Part 2
……—
".........Uhhh, is it really fine if you are dressed like this?"
"It's okay. Since ancient times, Kings that wore luxurious and gorgeous
clothings are often seen as concealing their inner superficiality, or for just selfgratification
to be seen as a corpulent person. A King is not just a national
role model, but also a goalfor the citizens to achieve— so in order to gain
love and respect from the people, you'll have to fight for it yourself."
"............Such sophism.........."
"Un, but ultimately, because I'm wearing this outfit, it calms me down alot."
"Ah..........anyways, I understand. But regarding the publication for the news,
this kind of details will be carefully spruced up."
Capital of Elchea— In front of the King city's public square.
It was a spectacular view after emerging out of the castle's balcony, with a
public square broader than the Piazza San Marco in Venice.
Currently, the square was being buried by a countless number of people.
Tens of thousands— tens of thousands of humans were gathered here.
But the more terrifying thing was, even the road that extended out of the
public square was filled with people.
Just to listen to a speech from their new king.
Some expressed out the disappointment towards the foolish king of the
previous generation.
Some expressed out happiness as an array of hope for the escape from the
abyss of despair had appeared.
Some expressed out curiosity for the siblings who faced against Elven spies
and defeated magic.
With the whole of Imanity's attention focusing on the balcony of the castle—
Two figures came out from the castle.
A boy and a girl.
Wearing jeans and a T-shirt with [I ♥ humans] written on it.
With dark circles underneath his eyes, a black-haired youth.
Having white glossing hair with snow colored skin.
With a pair of jewel-like ruby eyes, a girl wearing sailor uniform.
The crown on their heads clearly highlights that they were respectively the
king and queen.
—Just only.
The youth had bended the tiara that was supposedly on the girl's head, and
was wearing it on his arm like an armband.
While the girl was wearing the crown meant for the youth on her bundled
front hair—
The actions that they both did when changing could make anyone easily figure
out what kind ofscreams Steph might have issued out.
As for their overly casual kind of get-up.
In front of the momentarily stunned audience, the youth— which was Sora,
began speaking.
"Ah—.....,un, un~ ugh, good morning everyone."
".........Nii, is being nervous. How rare."
"—Stop that. You know very well that we both have agoraphobia
[22]
. But it's
weird, usually I would be able to control it."
Shiro avoided the gaze from the crowd, and gently held onto the hand of her
brother.
"......."
She was silent, as if implying, "Then control it now".
It has always been the same from the past till now— even if its in the future, it
willstill be the same.
"—Dearest citizens— no, every [Fellow human being] here!"
As if in reply to Shiro's silence, Sora dispelled his tense expression and loudly
exclaimed.
With his hands resting on the balcony that had voice amplifiers installed.
But the people could not help but think that there was no need for the voice
amplifiers due to his stern and loud voice that echoed everywhere.
"Our human kind..........being constrained by the 『Ten oaths』, forcing us to
have continuous failures due to the predicament of not having war, and what
remains now is this last city, this last country— and why is this happening?"
Hearing this question that was abruptly asked, the crowd went into
uncertainty.
—Because of the missteps from the previous king— because we are unable
to use magic.
All their hearts contained different answers, as they wait for Sora's next
words.
"Was it because the previous king failed? Or was it because we are ranked
16th? Or was it because we are unable to wield magic? Or was it because
we are the most inferior race? Does this equates to us feebly walking to the
path of destruction!?— sorry but, all of them are wrong!"
With the strong resolution to deny it, everyone got startled.
Clenching his chest, Sora shouted with an even more resonant voice, letting
his emotions out.
"Previously, when the Old Deus started a war, deities, magical beings—the
elves, orcs and other species that were also involved, we fought valiantly, and
the result was that we survived! And in the past, all the land in this continent
was occupied by Imanity, so why?!"
Based on the history read in Steph's private stack room in the past few days.
Sora inquired.
"Is it because our race are experts in using violence?! Or is it because we
specialize in fighting!?"
One after another, the crowd started looking at each other.
"We are unlike the elves who can use a variety of magic, nor do we possess
strong physical ability like orcs, and we don't have longevity like the Heavenly
Winged— but even so, did we who dominate these lands have any special
abilities meant for war— definitely not!!"
Yes, this is the fact that everyone understands. But it is also questionable at
the same time.
—Then, why?
"The reason why we were able to fight and survive, was because we were
[Weak]!"
"No matter the era or the world, the strong will always grind their teeth while
the weak experience wisdom! So why would we reach to such an impasse—
because from the agreement of the 『Ten Oaths』, the strong no longer grind
their teeth but experience the wisdom! No other reasons!"
"Our strength to survive comes from our patent schemes, strategies, tactics,
which are meant for the weak! But now it lies in the hands of the strong! Our
weapons forcefully taken away, and to fight against the strong with the same
weapons— caused this horrifying thing to happen!"
Being pointed out this situation that made people despair, the public square
went into silence.
The people struck by the answer felt despair, and were shrouded in
instability.
Surveying the crowd while sighing, Sora said.
"—Everyone, please don't lower your heads."
In contrast to his high vigor speech and the passionate waving of his fists from
before, Sora suddenly spoke with a calm voice.
"I'llrepeat it one more time, we are weak. Yes, both today—and in the past
—"
Sora reverted back to his loud voice and shouted.
"—Yes.......It has never changed up till now!"
"If the strong imitate the weak by brandishing our weapons, they won't be
able to exert their abilities! If you want to ask why, it's simply because the
weaklings' weapons— were developed from their weakness when we had
reached a servile state!"
.........Sora added an answer just when everyone was feeling conflicted.
"Because of our weakness, we trained our eyes, ears and thinking,
『Learning』 how to survive, that's our trait as humans!"
.......After falling into hellfor years, hope could finally be seen.
"The human species can't use magic, even perceiving it is impossible— but
because we are weak, we have the wisdom to run away from magic, and also
the intelligence to see through it! We don't have any extraordinary senses.
Simply because of being weak, from 『Learning』 and 『Experience』, we
gained the wisdom to achieve the unachievable, predicting the future!"
.......Only an optimist willsing optimistically.
.......Only a pessimist would speak about despair.
"I willreiterate for the third time! We are weak, and in no matter which
world, we will always savagely bite those complacent people who think that
they are the strong— until the 『Weak』 gain glory!"
........Because they were stuck in the depths of despair, there was not a ray of
light in the everlasting darkness.
"My little sister and I will declare, that we are the 255th generation, the king
and queen of Elchea."
..........Only the people who ignite the fire of hope can guide the public.
"Once again, I declare, the two of us willsurvive with the method of the
weak, fight with the method of the weak, slaughter the strong with the method
of the weak! Just like the past— it willstill be the same even in the present
and the future!"
..........So that no one would leave their footprints as a guide.
"Admit it! We, are the weakest race!"
"History willrepeat itself no matter what happens—we will be the ones to bite
the strong and nobody else!"
........Just like that.
"Rejoice! We are humans— we are the most talented people! Precisely
because we were born without any ability— we can achieve anything— this is
the will of the weakest race!"
.........a 『King』 was born.
Cheers— no, roars.
The public square, and even the skies started trembling.
An array of cries that sounded like both an angry roar and victory cheers.
And what were they expecting from the two people on the balcony?
Or perhaps— were they being cornered and were simply baring their fangs
and crying out?
In front of this scene, Sora and Shiro exchanged glances.
.........Nodding their heads.
Confirming that his little sister was smiling with glee after that nod, Sora began
his final moments of the speech.
Spreading open his arms, looking as pure as a curious child that was facing
against the boundless world.
But also exuding out the aura of a battle-hardened warrior with his usual
arrogance.
Sora—『Humanity's new hope』, said with an arrogant smile and a face filled
with naivety.
"—Come, let us begin the games!"
"Everyone must have had enough of the sufferings right. Starting to behave
servilely already right. Getting tired of tasting bitterness right.....................it's
enough already right? I've kept you waiting, fellow human beings."
Looking like he has the skies within his grasp, Sora pointed his hand to the
horizon.
Then— tightly clenched his fist.
"From this instant! We, Elchea— will issue a proclamation, declaring war on
countries all around the world!"
"The smoke has finally cleared! Our borders, better be honest and come
back to us!"

Part 3
Surrounded by the huge roars that could shake the heavens.
Leaving the balcony and heading towards the exit, Steph stopped them.
"Yo-yo—you! Wh-what did you just say— !?"
"Whoa~ why are you looking so flustered, you scared me."
"...........Steph, evil......"
Facing the frantic Steph who was screaming out in a rage, the siblings could
not help but wince under her unreasonable words.
But Steph did not give in.
"How can I be calm like this!? You have just finished the coronation
ceremony, and the municipal hasn't even finish handling Elchea as of now,
how are we going to have time to prepare for war against other countries!
Are you trying to destroy this place!?"
Hugging her head, Steph kept cursing that her idiocy actually made her
believe the words of the siblings.
But, maybe she was slowly getting used to it.
In order to get a glimpse of her adept movements, Sora sighed while saying.
"Ah..........I did say—that you should learn how to suspect people right?"
"—Hm?"
Steph suddenly stopped her movements, before gazing at Sora.
"Those elves— you stillremember Avant Heim right? They used Kurami,
provided support for her to win this country, defeating humans without
positive means just because we can't use magic right?"
"—Wh-what does that mean?"
"Have you forgotten? We have already made them think that we are
『Humans that need to be supported by other countries』 oh. Or at least this is
what the guy who was supporting Kurami is likely to report, and other
countries might be thinking of the same thing too."
In accordance to her brother's words, Shiro supplemented the sentence.
"..........Whole world, will think..........that some country's spy, is
administrating Elchea."
Nodding his head in affirmation, Sora continued.
"But, they don't know which country is doing it. Don't know which country is
controlling the spy, don't know which country used Elchea as a puppet to
declare war to the world, they will definitely think of it like this—『Elchea is
being used as a puppet to launch an intention to be on the offensive』."
"—Ah!"
In this world, the challenged party has the right to decide the contents of the
game.
Which is to say, in total disregard of the extremely unfavorable conditions,
Elchea has taken the initiative to declare war on the world.
Moreover, taking into consideration that the spy sent from Elven Gard was
found out—
"A certain country or race has obtained a trump card to see through the elf
race, so they will certainly be more vigilant right?"
"......So to say."
"The world will plunge into darkness where everyone is being suspected."
".........Just for this reason, deliberately made a declaration of war."
"But not being able to do a thing, is how it is♪"
Facing against the siblings who smiled and uttered those words, Steph was
rendered speechless.
"Article 5 of the 『Ten Oaths』, the challenged party has the right to decide the
contents of the game. Those countries would start to get wary of us due to
that declaration......and also start mobilizing against the non-existent country
that is backing us. Taking advantage of the countries that are trying to probe
for our ins and outs, we will use this chance to find loopholes, then slowly and
continuously secure back our territories."
Looking at Sora who was smiling wickedly while turning his body, Steph
asked.
"Th-then............all those things about recapturing territories...........are just
lies?"
Feeling slightly regretfulfor this matter that even surprised Steph herself.
But what Sora said was.
"—Hey, Steph. I had a discussion with my little sister— about whether we
want to return back to our original world."
"—Eh?"
"We realized that this was a no-brainer question. The answer will definitely be
『NO』— if we abandoned this world, what would we get when we return
back? Absolutely nothing."
"........Especially.........towards Shiro."
"That's how it is. So."
Slapping his hands together, Sora concluded.
"We are humans, and we are left with our sole country which is Elchea. So, in
order to prevent losing this place, becoming the king would be the first target
— but?"
Little sister and older brother. Looking at each other, they laughed pleasantly.
"Hey, little sister."
".....Un."
"The enemy can use magic, can use super powers, but we can't. We have an
overwhelming disadvantage, and also an underwhelming handicap,
furthermore, we are left with one more territory, the situation currently could
be said to be desperate. But, in the name of 『 』, we will not allow any
failures— what do you think?"
Shiro, with her face devoid of any expression except for a little boyish smile,
replied.
".....The best—"
"That's right~♪"
Steph looked at the genuine otherworldly— siblings that were clearly
incomprehensible.
Specifically, this was indeed a very desperate situation, yet the words that
were blurted out were actually 『The best』?
Sora turned back to face Steph who was undoubtedly puzzled.
"Then, going back to the question just now, Steph."
"—Ye-yes?"
Suddenly being accosted while in a daze, Steph could not help but change the
tone of her voice.
"About recapturing the border. Frankly, that's a lie."
"—Eh?"
Sora spoke while taking out his phone.
Opening his schedule manager, he marked a tick under 『Becoming King』.
Entering into a new target. Which was—
"『Final goal』— in short, conquering this world☆"
"—What—!?"
Recapturing borders— skipping over this— the words Sora said suddenly
jumped to world domination.
After hearing his gargantuan goal, Steph leaked out her voice.
How long must she continue being shocked before he becomes satisfied.
Sora then started walking away, with Shiro closely behind.
Realizing that she was getting deserted, Steph immediately snapped back into
reality and paced up to them.
"Eh, th-that, is it re-re-really the truth!?"
"For 『空白』
[23]
, anything other than first is unacceptable. No matter if it's
gambling for the country or what, as long as it is related to games, our motives
will always be to become 『the strongest』— this is our principle."
".........Un."
—Just when the development of things have reached this step.
Stephanie Dora realized that she was underestimating the siblings the whole
time.
Maybe.
Probably.
Really.
These two people—
—Are Imanity's 『Savior』?
Watching Sora whose figure was constantly receding away, a fierce reaction
came from her chest.
Her chest was being gripped tightly— except, the sense of disgust was
already long gone.
Restoring her grandfather's reputation.
Confronting and beating magic.
Saving her beloved country— Elchea.
Even going as far as to make a declaration to recapture territory.
Against the fading figure that made her believe that he could do it.
Any reasons to hate him.
For Stephanie Dora, she still hadn't found one yet.
Part 4
—Kingdom of Elchea, capital of Elchea, centralregion district 1.......
Which is, Elchea King City, the King's bedroom.
There was an extremely colossal bed that would make anyone wonder how
many people could fit into it placed in the center of the room.
Just a few days ago, he was still a NEET and useless— Sora(18-year-old
virgin).
"—From a cramped room, to a shabby Inn, before going to Steph's mansion,
and now, the King's bedroom— is that so."
Sora was holding onto a book while reminiscing about the past.
Basking in the darkness of the night, the name of the book that was dimly lit
by the moonlight was titled— 《The Ecology of the Sixteen Races》.
Staying on a particular page on the book, Sora was immersed in a deep
thought.
"— .......eh. I feel that those guys willreally be pulled
into the same front ah........"
What was written on the book— .
In the last war, they were created to be the vanguard for the gods, a race
capable of fighting in the air.
The Heavenly Winged
The Flügel
The Heavenly Winged
The Flügel
After the 『Ten Oaths』 were forged, their ability to fight was sealed up,
however, utilizing their longevity and the fact that they had a high degree of
adaptability for magic, with the floating species Phantasma— 『Avend Haze』
backing them up, they created a genuine sky city, using that as their sole
territory, and never competed in any gambling for the country.
But, perhaps it was due to their longevity, that they have a strong thirst for
knowledge, so in order to collect 『Intel』 from every other race— they
participated in the games to try and obtain other country's books.
"I feel that I can grasp a lot about knowledge regarding magic, furthermore, I
can use my 『Exclusive knowledge from another world』 as a bait."
If any contact was to be made with this race, the necessary preparations of
forming strategies to counter magic was definitely needed—
—Tok, Tok.
When he was thinking about these problems, a polite knock came from the
door.
Feeling like it was a déjà vu situation from a few days ago, Sora replied.
"I'm in, who is it?"
"It's Stephanie Dora.......can I come in?"
"—Ah? Please do."
Facing Steph who was slowly opening the King's set of heavy doors leading
to the bedroom, Sora said.
"I say, what is with that tone and attitude. It will be fine even if you casually
come in right."
"No.........that, if I think about it calmly, Sora— your majesty is now the king
of Elchea—"
"Argh— how uncomfortable!"
Sora loudly cut off Steph's words.
"Too uncomfortable, and also troublesome! It will be fine if it was like always,
okay, so what happened?"
In Elchea where electricity has yet to be discovered.
The things that were illuminating the bedroom were only the dimly-lit candles
on the chandelier, and also the faint moonlight.
"That— Sora......"
"Hmm?"
"In order to make me dedicate myself to you, you asked me to have a 『Crush
on you』 at that time, right."
"Eh— ah~....."
"Since Sora is currently the king of Elchea— I'm already, that........"
At that moment, the clouds suddenly dispersed and the moon brightened up.
What was further revealed was Steph's face.
—The expression on her face was, anxiousness.
"You.....are going to say that you don't think you have any more use, so you
want to request me to lift the【 Oath】, right?"
"N-not-not that meaning."
—Even if he possessed a super-class level in games, in the end, he was still
an eighteen year old virgin.
For him to make a judgment completely miles away, Steph quickly made
amendments.
"I-I hope— you could..........tell me. Wh-why, that, your request, wasn't like
what your sister had said—『Become my property』, but have a 『Crush on
me』......"
"......That....."
That was surely an attempt.
It could be described as a vulgar desire from deep within Sora's heart, but it
was also a mistake at the same time.
When Sora was thinking about whether he should honestly say these reasons
out.
An unexpected question suddenly surfaced in himself.
"That— asking me to fall in love with you.........that, for me, you had those
feelings, right?"
.......Eh?
"I-If that was really the truth...........then, the only thing I— can sacrifice,
is......"
Then, she slowly walked towards the bed, carrying an uneasy expression
flushed with embarrassment.
Her skirt— she slowly raised it up, before saying something as ifshe was
pleading.
"I'm only left with this, nothing more—"
—Wait a moment.
—Wait a moment, eighteen-year-old virgin Sora.
Now, you have just faced an unmistakably inescapable question.
It was like that...........from an objective point of view, Steph was indeed
considered as a high-standard beauty.
If liked by such a beautiful girl, naturally all the boys will harbor these kinds of
thoughts.
However— forcing her to have a crush on him, why is that so?
—Love at first sight?
No, this is not accurate enough.
Although he tried to ask himself, that if he told Steph it was because he had
feelings of love—
No— in the end.
(Eh—? Feelings of love, what kind of feeling is it in the first place?)
—At this time, Sora had reached the limit of what you would call an
unpopular man.
".....That...........is, this......"
'Kacha!'
A sound, followed by a flash.
Quietly sticking her head out from the opposite side of the bed— was Shiro
who was wielding onto a cellphone.
"Yahaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa!"
Realizing that Shiro was in the same room, Steph panicked and immediately
put down her skirt.
—But, it was natural that she should have noticed this matter.
As long as she thought of the things back in the Inn— she would know that
Sora could never be alone.
"........Represent, Nii who is troubled...........by his virginity..........Shiro will
explain."
"Shiro-san........to be told off like this when you are just an eleven-year-old
little sister, you surely are giving your brother a hard blow."
But ignoring the protesting sentence from her older brother, Shiro showed the
picture that she had taken just now.
Which was the self-upskirting shot that Steph did.
"....This."
"—Eh?"
".....The reason why Nii, made Steph, to fall in love."
Facing Steph who did not understand— as well as Sora.
As if wanting to make both of them understand in one fellswoop, Shiro
succinctly described.
"........Nii, misses something, from........our......original world."
"........This world, inside— doesn't have......『Dessert』."
""————Huh?""
Both Steph and Sora simultaneously shouted out in surprise.
But only, they interpreted it differently.
Sora straightforwardly protested against this accusation.
And Steph—
"Dessert......? What, does it refers to?"
Innocently gave a simple question. Playing with her phone, Shiro answered.
".......Masturbation, time.........imagine things.........with photos and
videos.........all are included. During masturbation, usage of all those
stuffs..............are known as—『Dessert』....."
"...Mastur........bate?"
With Steph still clueless about what was going on, Shiro with her deadpan,
Firmly held onto— and began moving it up and down.
"———Wh———"
Hearing a 'bang' sound in her mind, Steph's face flushed red, before she
approached Shiro.
Opening the file in her phone, Shiro showed it to Steph.
—What was playing on the phone, was the scene where both Shiro and
Steph were in the bath, with Steph washing Shiro's hair.
"........This is.............the Steph...........『raison d'etre』."
Steph's face turned pale at first, before she lowered her head and deeply
shook.
—Which means, anyone could be in it, right.
——Purely for sex, he requested it, right.
———Furthermore, even his sister is naked too, that, that kind of thing,
right!?
"Sha—Shameless"
Screaming loudly, Steph dashed out of the room— Sora could only watch
her leave innocently.
Thereafter, Shiro returned back to her previous position with an attitude as if
that didn't happen and asked.
"—I say, I have never thought ofsomething that disgusting to that extent oh?"
"..........But, to interpret......"
"That's just a super wrong interpretation right...........and just now that, wasn't
it the video inside the bath? Didn't you say that you wouldn't let me watch that
even when 『it came out』— unless, you are deliberately trying to make Steph
hate me right?"
".....Shiro, eleven-years-old...........don't know, too complicated things."
"Only at this inappropriate time then you would behave like a child......"
"........The picture just now, don't want it......?"
"Ah, sorry director. I want it."
—But.
In reality— what's the difference between love and sex?
To Sora, this was just a philosophicalreflection if he were to immerse himself
into it.
In a voice where he could not hear, Shiro— the little sister who has no blood
relations with Sora, muttered.
"........Seven years, more......."
—Although there was a saying that girls are more precocious than boys in
terms of maturity.
But........at least for the situation as of now, this is the unshakable truth.
——…………
"Ahhhhhhhhhhhhh really, ah——this is enough ———!"
On the other hand, Steph angrily stomped through the hallway.
For her to be simply used as a materialfor masturbation— which is not so.
She felt that she had hurt herself after hearing that, roaring angrily.
"AHhhhhhhhhhhh really, these feelings are all an illusion, it's because of the
Oaths' fault— this is just a curse!"
—However, Steph didn't notice such things.
"That monkey! Lolicon! How can I like him! This is all the Oaths' fault!"
—Letting Sora 『Release the Oaths』—Which is to say.
Proposing another game to be held, and force him to say 『Don't have a crush
on me』.
This solution was completely ignored, or she had completely forgotten this
fact.
Or is there a significance behind it—.

Part 1
Audience Hall, King City. Elchea.
Currently, there were two people sitting on the throne, immersed in a DSP
[24]
game.
A youth with black hair, wearing a T-shirt with 『I♥Humans』 on it and jeans,
as well as a bent tiara on his arm.
A girl with skin and hair as white as snow, wearing a sailor uniform, and
crimson-colored eyes, as well as a crown that was worn on her bundled front
hair.
To tell you the truth— they are the king of this kingdom—Sora, and the
Queen— Shiro.
"So, if you are going to play in that method, make sure you don't fall into the
traps."
"...........Prioritized, efficiency."
"If you want to pursue efficiency, then doesn't using that method serve no
purpose at all? Just go all out, go all out!"
"...........Simply, a waste of time, not, interesting at all."
"I guess that's about it for this one then............. shall we play some other
games?"
Even though the two of them had brought a huge number of games to this
world.
They had already played all of them.
Which is to say, it's really doubtful if they can pass the time playing those
games.
But there was a justified reason why the siblings were bored. That's because
—
"I-I'm done with changing......"
Hearing that voice, both of them sent their DSPs into sleep mode without a
slight hesitation and took out their phones.
Accompanying the voice was the figure of a red-haired girl with the qualities
of a beauty— but only.
What she was wearing was over the top— yet not too much under these
circumstances, a extremely revealing maid outfit.
Stephanie Dora............lineage of the previous King, formerly a member of
royalty— and now.
Looking at Steph, whose face was flushed, Sora said-
"Hmm? So this degree of exposure will make you blush, eh?"
".........Didn't, let her... wear underwear."
"Co-could you please not specifically say it out loud!?"
Steph shouted out.
—Yes. Both kings were currently fumbling over the boundaries of 18 and
above.
Simply hearing 『That way, Nii, will be happy』, Steph knew that she would
be unable to defy Shiro's words.
Similar to the efforts of love— no, it should be more correct to say that she
had already become a toy for them to play with.
She could not help but masochistically look up the ceiling.
"Ah, she really looks like a 2D character."

"....Un.....but, still not enough."
"Yes, director. After all, she isn't as quiet as real 2D characters, so it definitely
won't give one the utmost satisfaction."
".......Let her, strip?"
"Hmm— Steph. Can you undo your outfit more, but make sure that we can't
see your nipples and private parts?"
"Please don't say private parts, ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh!"
".......Then, a flash."
"NO. Because she is not wearing any, It'll instantly be a no go, director."
".......Never mind.......how about, to cover up— sticking on a band-aid?"
"Hmm............Hmm......no, wait.......eh? But I think it'llstill be counted as a
no go?"
"..........Then, is a tiny swimsuit..........also a no go?"
"—In-indeed. But director, won't sticking band-aids on the naked body
work?"
"......Gu........all ages, difficult."
——Leaning on the throne, Sora quietly muttered.
"But I think no matter how much we let her wear a costume that is barely OK
for filming, if the fact stands that there will be no chances for me to fap, then
isn't it useless to pile up videos......"
Shiro, who keenly heard those words, replied.
"........Shiro..........doesn't mind, feelfree."
"Your brother isn't an exhibitionist, okay?"
"......Shiro, won't see.......it's okay........at home, it's the same."
"Un? No, wait wait wait, but I only do it when you are asleep."
".........Even slight movements......Shiro will wake up."
"You— were awake the whole time!?"
Sora covered his reddened and ashamed face with both his hands.
"No way— I can't get married anymore—!"
".......Shiro will marry you, no problem."
Shiro gently patted him on the shoulder as encouragement.
"I say—!"
"If you say that you can't get married anymore, what should I, who was
requested to wear such costumes, do!"
Steph, whose shoulders were trembling, shouted out before she intolerably
continued her words.
"It's better to say- how could you throw the whole task of arranging the
coronation formalities to me alone, then suddenly calling me out for this thing
after three continuous nights of working! Are you really noble?!"
"..........Shiro, is king........the king.....noble."
Shiro gave a decent piece of advice, while Sora nonchalantly continued.
"If it's all-nighters for three days, we're also the same. Even if we continued
for another two days, it'll be easy."
"Doesn't your case only apply to games!?"
"Yep, games. In this world, that's a king's job."
"Guu......"
Yes— games decided everything— even borders were also decided using
this method.
It was necessary to be the best of the best in games to be a king, but it could
also be an exercise.
"Oh yeah, if playing games here is considered a good job, this really is
paradise, eh."
Facing Sora who looked like he had found an ideal home, Steph cried out.
"This is totally not a good job! You'd better settle the internal affairs first!'
"Then........is the coronation job finished yet?"
"Yes, just before I was summoned here."
"That was really long. After all the civilization games I've played, it will be a
piece of cake to deal with the internal affairs."
Concluding his sentence, Sora moved Shiro aside and stood up from the
throne.
"Then— could you gather all the ministers here?"
Part 2
When all the ministers were gathered at the parliament building.
Sora and Shiro went onto the stage—
But they interrupted all the reports and began speaking first.
"I have something to say."
With everyone's attention directed on his face, Sora— humanity's king started
giving out orders.
"Everyone should know by now, that <Imanity> is currently at an impasse.
We can be on the offensive, but we can't guard against attacks from the
inside. So to cut off all worries here— we will proceed with Jan-Ken."
He spread open his hands and raised it above his head.
Facing the ministers that were entirely focused on him, Sora bellowed.
"With [From now on, allfalse reports are strictly prohibited, as well as the act
of arbitrarily conveying false information] as the wager.........Swear upon the
【Ten Oaths】 that you will deliberately lose to me."
With the [Absolute compliance] rules in the Oaths, winning a game without
lifting a finger could be used.
—Wearing an expression that clearly depicted curiosity on why this wasn't
thought out by the previous kings, Sora said.
"Then everyone, with the responsibility of humanity's fate resting on our
shoulders, let's have a game of rock, paper, scissors— I will use scissors.
Everyone else, please use paper to prove your loyalty to me. Additionally,
those that underestimate the observation and memory skills of us siblings, you
don't have to take part in this false match and can refuse this contract.
However, I'd advise you to use this opportunity to leave."
—To those who decided from the start to lose and be in compliance with the
Oaths, Sora raised his hand—
"【Acciente】"
"""—【Acciente】!"""
Using these conditions, rock, paper, scissors began.
Just like that— conditions were exchanged between both parties.
".........Then, firstly, the agriculture minister— report."
"Yes— our country's food supplies are currently facing a profound question."
Continuing onwards, the agriculture's morphology, management method, the
distribution of taxes, etc.
Listening to all of this, Sora gently nodded his head.
"I understand........then please carry out what I am going to tell you next."
"......Yes."
"Regarding agriculture— I will introduce a rotation for the agriculture."
"—Yes, what does that mean?"
"In every ranch, start with winter wheat, then turnips, beets and root related
crops, then Summer barley and rye, then alfalfa and other crops that can
restore fertility. In sequence, farm them in a cycle."
Smoothly, as if it was naturalfor him.
Facing an opinion that would clearly make anyone doubt their own ears,
everyone could only be astonished.
Furthermore—
"With regards to that, disperse the workforce and make them concentrate on
a specific area, the most important two points. Although this would lead to
some smallfarmers becoming unemployed, the amount of food production
would increase by four times or more. So put this as the highest priority."
Even the ensuing results had been pointed out.
"Bu-budget, how to allocate it?"
"Command the bank to use the national debt to purchase in large bulks—
however, this matter should be left for the economy minister."
"— O-obeyed."
"Following that, there will be a need to deal with the problem of
unemployment resulting from this policy. Economy minster, and Industry
minister, please report—"
—….....
After that, the King gave out orders one after another, totally reforming the
system.
In a span of four hours, the meeting finally ended.
The ministers would discuss that Sora was probably 『Humanity's greatest
king』 in private.
........Swinging his tablet PC with one hand, Sora said.
"Ahhhhh— I feel like an idiot, but it was the right choice to download that ebook
about games which was loaded with all those specialized books."
The tablet PC— contained more than forty thousand books.
Besides mathematics, chemistry, astronomy, physics and engineering, there
were also medicine, history and even tactical books.
Even information given only to teachers were all extracted and saved— which
is to say, all the knowledge human beings possessed in the twenty-first
century were mounted inside.
"..........Nii, sure enough, as titled..............that is, cheating."
Pointed out by Shiro with squinted eyes, Sora frowned before replying.
"In this world where magic exists and is an official method to cheat, does
passing on some technicalskills from another world really count as cheating?
And also, stability and internal affairs are always a priority."
.......Even so, introducing advanced technicalskills of the future might lead to
an unexpected outside influence.
Honestly, although the thought of introducing [Electrical engineering] was very
tempting.
"At least we will be able to make a camera and microphone, which would
slightly be able to confront magic."
There was no certainty as to what the two cell phones which were unable to
receive signals could do.
Sure enough, the method to communicate with the still
needed to be found—
—Suddenly, still dressed in the maid outfit which was full of exposure, Steph
quietly walked into the meeting room.
That was— the outfit that Shiro and Sora requested for her to wear.
The Heavenly Winged
The Flügel
"......Sora— No. You-your majesty......you have a guest."
"—You, actually tended to a guest in that outfit? How brave."
"........Steph, powerful."
"You should've just said it clearly that I could change! Guahhhh!"
Because of Steph's cries, Sora waved his hands while plugging his ears.
"Ah— okay okay, sorry, you should go and change now. Really, this will
definitely question the morality of this country."
"What really needs to be questioned is the things stored in your brain!"
However, not waiting for Steph to take charge, a big sound echoed in the
meeting room.
"Ahahahahahahaha, looks like something interesting is brewing."
Sora and Shiro, Steph, as well as the ministers turned to face the voice.
'Kata, kata'— walking in, was a teenager.
That familiar face, had previously left an impression on Sora and Shiro.
It was definitely him.
During that time— when hands stretched through the computer screen—
pulling both of them into this world—
"........Yo, isn't this that self-proclaimed Kami-sama
[25]
. How's it going?"
"How cruel. That is not a self proclamation, but a true and genuine Kamisama."
Scratching his head with a smile, the teenager said.
"Speaking of which, I haven't introduce myself yet right—"
"—『TET』........at your service. Pleased to meet you, 『 』-san."
All of a sudden—
When the name of that teenager was spoken, the whole atmosphere
underwent a change.
Or perhaps this was the influence power that the name of Kami possessed.
Aside from Sora and Shiro, everyone else felt goosebumps and a huge
amount ofsweat flowed out.
The ministers were paled-face, and Steph was trembling as ifshe was going
to collapse any second.
But, to them, they didn't mind it nor get affected by it at all.
"So how is it, my world. Satisfied with it?"
"Ah, of course, you really have good taste. A doctrine that our world should
follow to."
"....Yeap."
For Sora and Shiro who were joking around.
Everyone was experiencing a feeling similar to their heart being clenched.
—What stood in front of them was the sole Kami—『TET』.
An authoritative figure who could destroy and re-create the world as he liked.
But, the Kami-sama that they knew was putting on a smile and laughing.
"That would certainly be better than before. Okay.......it appears that
Humanity's crisis has been resolved eh."
"That's right, just like you had hoped."
A surprised expression was on everyone's faces.
"Coincidentally in the city near your home, coincidentally in Humanity's last
country, coincidentally hosting the King's election game.........these kinds of
things, I hope you won't say something like [It's just pure coincidence] right."
Facing the bold words coming from Sora, Kami laughed comfortably.
"Ahahah........But please do not misunderstand. I am basically a spectator,
never helping a particular race— but then, only this once, I let my personal
feelings go wild."
The teenager— or Kami, looking somewhat disgruntled, kicked the floor in
boredom, before saying.
"Remember what I said........that phrase— [A world where everything is
decided by games]."
—As if realising something, Sora learned the meaning behind these words and
replied.
".......I see. Even the throne of Kami, is also decided by games right?"
"——Wha——"
—Aside from an admirable look from Shiro, everyone else was
dumbfounded.
After that the sole Kami— TET, let out a pleasant smile and said.
"Correct♪ For this motive, I deliberately stated that there were the
."
In an instant— the puzzles inside Sora's mind pieced together.
16 races— on the other side of the horizontal chessboard— Kami was said
to live there.
Each side of the chess that has chess pieces— numbered 16. Which means.
【16 races】
Exceed
"........Subduing every single race, would entitle a right— a right to『Challenge
Kami』right?"
Happily smiling, TET replied.
"Your thinking speed really is worthy of being praised. An adaptability that
someone from a different world cannot possibly have."
"That really is a generous compliment♪"
"It is just as you said. It's rare for me to deliberately bet up『The throne of
Kami』for an outcome, but I've already spent a few thousand years of
boredom till it could no longer be boring anymore. So, while wandering in a
different world, I heard the rumours of 『 』."
Feeling both elated and excited, Kamisaid so while looking at the siblings.
"A legend of being the top in every game, the urban legend about these
gamers."
Against Kami who was smiling while exclaiming out, Sora arrogantly said with
an unyielding expression.
"I say Kami-sama, can I laugh?"
"Hmm?"
"After knowing about our situation, you summoned us into this world. Doesn't
that imply that— you were familiar with the principle behind 『 』— about
us being [the top in every game]?"
"Un, of course."
Still holding onto that fearless smile, Kamireplied.
"Because of this. I believe— that you will definitely earn the right to challenge
me."
Everyone who heard that were stunned into position.
These words— means that it went beyond the world's largest country— the
elves that were ranked 7th.
Or maybe it even pointed swords at the ranked one and ranked two,
<OldDeus> and <Fantasma> respectively.
Which is— the meaning of dominating all of .
This wasn't something that was going to stop even after the whole world was
conquered—
"........Hey, Kami-sama, can I ask again. If I could laugh?"
"You, haven't forgotten that you lost to us once right?"
【16 races】
Exceed
—This time, everyone could not help but wonder if they heard wrongly.
——Kami, lost?
———lost to someone standing here, a simple human?
However, TET only smiled gently.
"Hehe, although you should've understood by now, I willstill emphasise it, the
[Games] here are different from your world's internet chess oh? Indeed, I did
lose to you siblings in『Ordinary chess』— and because of that, I summoned
you both here. But.........I won't lose the next time oh?"
At this time, Sora and Shiro, understood something.
Exchanging glances with each other, they smiled.
"—Kami-sama."
However, Kami-sama— kindly responded to them.
"It's alright if you call me TET. Is there anything wrong?"
"About that, TET— you, haven't lost before right?"
Just these words.
The fearless smile on TET's face changed.
"Playing as a Kami— this is his first defeat. He would then feel an
incomparable remorse, remorseful until it became unbearable. That's why you
summoned us here— to win under the [Rules of this side]. Am I right?"
"Hehe.......interesting. Why would you think so?"
With his smile still unshaken, TET asked.
"Because that feeling, we ourselves understand it as well. 『 』has never
failed before— however, we experienced numerous failures when facing
against each other."
".......But, definitely not allowed, running after winning."
"In the end, my genius little sister and I know that feeling."
".......Nii, full ofsneaky measures........more and more, terrible."
"Oi, don't you say that I'm full ofsneaky measures. Tricks are also a part of
the game now."
".....Cheater, how despicable."
"It's not a problem if no one found out! Isn't this side of the world the same as
well!?"
Gazing at the siblings' battle.
And feeling calmness in his heart, TET laughed so loudly that everyone aside
from the siblings shrunk.
"Ahahahahaha. Un, it was indeed the right choice to summon you here. Yeap,
definitely no running after winning. Next time will be my win— it was also one
of the reasons why I called you here oh. Disappointed?"
"Why? Rather than say out a more noble reason like saving Humanity, you
make us feel more at ease eh. So, did Kami-sama leisurely come here just to
deliberately say those words?"
"Nope, I came to express my gratitude."
"You both— Although <Imanity> was just a side-effect, you still defeated
Elven Gard, and let the world fall into suspicion in accordance with your plan.
The Eastern United Front are extremely concerned with the [Phone] that you
displayed out, thinking so hard about which country could have developed
that until they couldn't sleep. What are your thoughts? Similarly, Avand Haze
is also deeply interested and curious about the technology that defeated Elven
Gard. And as for Elven Gard, they are buzzing with activity thinking about
where the technology that defeated them came from. If they found out that
they were not defeated by cheats but rather face-to-face— haha, they will
definitely catch you and examine you closely."
For TET who kindly provided some intelligence, Sora asked in a somewhat
surprised tone.
"Didn't you say, that you won't help any particular race?"
"Un, so take this as a thank-you gift. Bringing back enthusiasm to such a
boring world, I provided you such information for thanks. Because this is the
first time, this will also be the last, so please utilize this meaningfully oh."
"Then, If I continue to stay here, everyone else won't be able to calm down,
so this is where I depart. BYEBYE♪"
Concluding his sentence, TET smiled and turned around, walking out.
Hearing these words from Kami who was about to leave, Sora and Shiro
shouted out.
"Oi, TET!"
"Hmm?"
"Thank you for giving us new life. Indeed— this is the world where we should
belong."
".....Thank you, Kami-sama."
Then, the three of them said in unison.
"""........In the upcoming future— let us meet on the board."""
—Just like that, TET disappeared as if dissolving into the air.
This act allowed everyone else to breath again, feeling completely relieved
that it ended.
—I wonder if this legend was heard?
"Fuu.....what an interesting Kami eh."
"......wanted, to play game.....with him."
—In all games, a champion player had set unbroken records.
—Suddenly, that mysterious gamer disappeared, losing all contact.
—For the [Urban Legend]— it eventually became a [Myth].
"Th-th-that gentleman— was the so-so-so-sole Kami-sama !?"
"Ki-King! Di-did you really win against Kami!"
"No, compared to that, the Eastern United Front has already started to take
action on us, in our current state we will—"
"Before that, Elven Gard has already began on us! If they have their eyes on
our King and Queen—"
—Then, the story about the disappearance that soon became a
myth....
—Will shift to a new stage known as [Disboard], the story will
continue writing even after it had finished.
"Ahh—how annoying! Don't talk at the same time!"
".....Nii."
"Ah, I got it—"
Facing all the people that were juxtaposed.
Sora stood on stage with an aloof expression.
Placing his foot on the conference table, he said with open arms.
—Although it is a fixed phrase.
—It also has it's own beauty. So we will start with this.
—『A long long time ago——』
"Okay— let us begin the games. Target, let's just set it to defeating Kamisama♪"
—Then, this new myth, shall begin narrating from now.
Afterwords
Fuuu~~~~~~~This is it, this is it! I always wanted to do this— an
[Afterwords]! Nice to meet you, because I am always the [Party responsible
for the illustrations], so I always dreamt that I would write an afterwords with
the position of a writer, and it was finally realized today— I am the writer and
illustrator called Kamiya Yuu. Erm, I am actually a mangaka. Ah, yes,
un........I'm currently taking a break........because I am suffering from a
troublesome illness, I will temporarily stop the work of my manga due to the
great burden. And also, credits to [Itsuka Tenma no Kuro Usagi](Fujimi
Fantasia Bunko). Compared to a mangaka, I feel that being an illustrator
earns more recognition......even reaching out to the light novels, so my current
job is.........no, but then, I am still drawing mangas! Okay, going back to
topic, 《No Game, No Life》is my debut novel. It was originally an idea for a
manga. But in accordance to Sensei's hope, "I like this fantasy setting, but I
hate fighting!". So, for me who hates the troublesome drawings needed for
fighting manga based on my personal experience, I fulfilled that wish! But then
I thought, "Erm, why don't I just create a fantasy world where fighting doesn't
exist!". When I'm not working nor sleeping, I devoted all my time to create a
setting about [Games]!"
『Even the borders are also determined by games——this is gambling for the
country!』
With this mindset and all of my ideas, I tried it out. However~ unfortunately
this plan did not take form. I hoped that one day, this would be accepted, so
I wrote down the plot line. At that time, because of my sudden poor physical
condition, I had to stop my manga job. Laying on the hospital bed while being
SUPER bored and the fact that games were forbidden, it feels as if—
—God said.........that fate won't allow you to <Fade away>.
.......Gu, I hope it isn't too late. It should still be okay, I can't give up. Just like
that, when I was in the hospital, I dramatically changed the plot to make it feel
like what a novel would have. And with this style— ah, I suddenly
remembered something from Editor-san— "Because there are some people
who decide whether to buy a book based on the afterwords, you better
publicize it well." So, let's start, shall we?
No Game, No Life.
A pair ofsiblings only good at games.
Those two useless pieces of trash were thrown intoA
world, where war is banned and everything is decided by games.
Including life— even the borders of the world were being gambled.
Enemies— are those who can use magic and supernatural powers, the 【16
races】.
[Bet it......your everything.]— Little sister— Shiro, 11 years old
/Hikkikomori/Anti-social.
[No way— it is impossible for humans to defeat magic!] — Stephanie Dora,
18 years old/Victim the majority of the time/Royalty(?)
—And mankind cannot use magic.
Desperately stuck in an adversity, the worst situation, butStirring
the nation!
An anti-fighting, game battle fantasy!
Can you, the <Author>, survive the impact of the well-known <Deadline>?
[For humankind to survive in this world........there is only one method......]—
Kurami, ???
[Don't.......underestimate humans!] — Older brother— Sora, 18 years
old/Unemployed virgin/NEET.
Author— Kamiya Yuu, Idiot/Pervert/Phobia of deadlines.
Okay— the original text should have such a feeling. (No joke).
Although there is a possibility of fraud present in this, like other Hollywood
movies.
For everyone who started reading from the afterwords, in order to confirm
the authenticity, I hope you will choose this as a read♪
For those of you who have finished reading this novel— that, un, erm.
IF you think that this will be good enough to be sold as a manga, with me as
the mangaka, then I will have to ask for forgiveness—
"Kamiya-sensei, Kamiya-sensei."
—Eh? Ah, yes, is there something wrong? Editor S-san
[26]
.
"Do you want me to listen to things regarding the manga? After all, Kamiyasensei
has tangible achievements as a mangaka—"
Ahahha, sorry, regarding that, I can't hear clearly because the phone is too far
away.
"Didn't you say that it was [Because of your poor physical condition, you
can't draw mangas and will try to write novels which have a smaller burden],
yet at the end of this novel, you could still draw some storyboard?"
Wasn't it you who asked me to draw this!
"Eh? I only suggested [Since the author and illustrator are the same person,
and is still a mangaka, you could use this point to boost some publicity]."
—From this statement, was there any other meaning besides [Drawing
Manga]?
"I didn't say that, right?"
Guuuu.
In my eyes, the image of lead editor and the protagonist seems to coincide
together.
Stephanie's antipathy, or maybe it was stronger than that☆
Ah, right.
In the same month, Takaya Kagami's work.
《Itsuka Tenma no Kuro Usagi》 Volume 10.[The Witch Laughing in the
Schoolyard], will be responsible by yours truly!
I am also serious in that side also oh, so be sure to read that too!
......Fuu, then, after writing till here.
It hasn't ended yet.
Better to say, currently— I am in Brazil.
Because I did mention that I had "Physical problems.", so I temporarily
returned back to my homeland.
Or maybe, the text and illustrations in 《No Game, No Life》
The illustrations for Itsuka Tenma no Kuro Usagi too, will be completed here,
in Brazil.
—A number of large suitcases, filled with LCD screens and a computer.
"The purpose for leaving?"
To cure my illness.
"What is all of this equipment for?"
Work use.
.......In short, because of all the tariff disputes that arose, the situation was not
difficult to imagine.
—Yeah, it sounds really deceiving. I am just a patient.
Getting treated halfway around the world, while getting grilled by the
publishing companies. I really want to cry.
"Forgive me, Kamiya-sensei."
Ah? What happened? Lead editor S-san.
"No, I am actually an M[27]— anyways, you have recognized the schedule for
MF Bunko J and FujimiBunko already, right?"
I don't remember any impression of it at all!
"No, even if told off like this....."
Speaking of which, New Year's Eve of CM has already entered the final
sprint of the twelfth lunar month, of course I won't take the schedule seriously,
right!
"No, that, it should've been Kamiya-sensei without a dou—"
Lead Editor S-san started emanating killing intent.
As expected of the successor of former editor Catherine-san.......the mirrorlike
moves were definitely a surprise.
Targeting someone who has dumbfounded—.......
Then.......will this do?
"———Then, what are you talking about?"
Ex. Tend. Dead. Line♥
"Guu— the signal is quite bad, I couldn't quite catch it—"
But ah, adjusting the number of pages and cutting the text to 8 pages, I am
afraid that I had [Forgotten to include the 10 illustrations from Itsuka] the
moment I returned back to Japan, so the situation is unprecedented.
"..........That, you can't treat it as if it happened, right?"
If the proofreader willremove this part, can I say it out loud?
"Because of me, Editor S's fault, I will give you more work, even the remedial
work will be handed to Kamiya-sama, sorry and I hope you forgive me."
—Very good, a perfect plan for revenge against me.
Till then, I sincerely hope we meet in the next volume.
"Ah, oh right. Kamiya-sensei, when will the manuscript for volume 2 be
completed? Eh? Kamiya-sensei~~~~~~~Hey~~~~~~~!"
References
1. ↑ 『 』 is pronounced "Kuuhaku" (空白). It literally means "blank" or
"blank space" in Japanese. This is why there is an empty space for the
name. The author chose to do this, so we decided to keep it that way.
2. ↑ "Rez" is short for "resurrect". Sora wants Shiro to resurrect his
character.
3. ↑ Calorie Mate is a brand of energy supplement foods. It comes in
block, can, and jelly forms. There are many flavors of Calorie Mate. It
is produced by Otsuka PharmaceuticalCo. in Japan.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/CalorieMate
4. ↑ Here, Sora complains about the high price of Calorie Mate (about 2
US dollars). He usually eats cup ramen noodles (about 25 cents per
package if he buys in large packages).
5. ↑ Tatami mats are a type of traditionalJapanese mat used for flooring.
Nowadays, it is only used in traditionalJapanese rooms as flooring or
just as mats to sit on. They are also used as a type of measurement of a
room's size. One tatami mat is on average about 0.9 meters by 1.8
meters in size. That would mean that their room is 25.92 square
meters, or 279.001 square feet in size.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tatami
6. ↑ Anthropophobia is the pathologicalfear of other people.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anthropophobia
7. ↑ A "shit game", or "kusoge", is a game that is terrible in all aspects.
For some reason, some people actually enjoy playing these games, as
they are often unintentionally funny. They also consider it an
accomplishment to beat such an awful game.
8. ↑ Deus is the Latin term for a god. The singular and pluralforms of the
word "deus" are the same.
9. ↑ Remember from the Prologue that it means "Blank", for Shiro and
Sora's names combined.
10. ↑ "Un" appears many times in this book. The Japanese are very good
with being concise in their wording, and so often use phrase fragments
to mean an entire phrase or sometimes, as in this example, a sound to
mean something. It has the same kind of meaning as "yep" or "yeah".
11. ↑ IMHO- In my humble opinion.
12. ↑ A scared or crying face.
13. ↑ Similar to "biting off more than you can chew".
14. ↑ Type of field usually means how well a gamer fares in a situation, for
example, someone whose type of field is the carry role in DOTA.
15. ↑ In French, it means "superior force". It is an unavoidable,
unprecedented event not caused by man, but by nature. It can also be
referred to as "an act of God".
16. ↑ In other words, flat as a board.
17. ↑ In Japan, NG stands for No Good Shot, and the English equivalent
of this would be a "blooper". She's afraid of causing a NG by showing
a naked grade schooler's body.
18. ↑ Mature 18, or 18 and above years old.
19. ↑ M18 and Issued ban has the same Japanese pronunciation
20. ↑ だが断る！A Jojo reference of Rohan
21. ↑ Galge, or gal games, are dating simulation games.
22. ↑ Fear of crowds and willfeel anxiety
23. ↑ Translated as Blank, the name of the Sora and Shiro.
24. ↑ Reference to PSP
25. ↑ God, In Japanese.
26. ↑ Kamiya is referring to the editor as an "S", or sadist, because of his
harsh deadlines and demands.
27. ↑ "M"means masochist
